CIK: 1145197
Company Name: INSULET CORP
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2019-02-26
Accession Number: 0001145197-19-000003


Item 1 Business Overview We are primarily engaged in the development, manufacturing and sale of our proprietary Omnipod System, an innovative, discreet and easy to use continuous insulin delivery system for people with insulin dependent diabetes. The Omnipod System consists of 2 product lines the Omnipod Insulin Management System ( Omnipod ), which we have been selling since 2005, and our next generation Omnipod DASH TM Insulin Management System ("Omnipod DASH" or "DASH"), which began a U.S. limited market release in 2018. Collectively, we refer to these products as the "Omnipod System". There are 2 primary types of insulin therapy practiced today multiple daily injection ( MDI ) therapy using syringes or insulin pens; and pump therapy using insulin pumps. Insulin pumps are used to perform continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion and typically use a programmable device and an infusion set to administer insulin into the person body. Insulin pump therapy has been shown to provide people with insulin dependent diabetes with numerous advantages relative to MDI therapy. We estimate that approximately 1 third of the Type 1 diabetes population in the United States and less than 1 fifth of the Type 1 diabetes population outside the United States use insulin pump therapy. An even smaller portion of the insulin dependent Type 2 diabetes population in the United States use insulin pump therapy. We believe these factors present a significant available market for the Omnipod System globally. The Omnipod System features 2 discreet, easy to use devices a small, lightweight, self adhesive disposable tubeless Pod ("Pod"), which is worn on the body and provides up to 3 days of non stop insulin delivery without the need to see or handle a needle; and a handheld Personal Diabetes Manager ("PDM"). The Pod can be worn in multiple locations, including the abdomen, hip, back of upper arm, upper thigh or lower back and, because it is waterproof, there is no need to remove it when showering, swimming or performing other activities. The Omnipod System communicates wirelessly, provides for virtually pain free automated cannula insertion and eliminates the need for traditional MDI therapy or the use of traditional pump and tubing. We believe that the Omnipod System unique proprietary design and features allow people with insulin dependent diabetes to manage their diabetes with unprecedented freedom, comfort, convenience, and ease. We began commercial sales of the Omnipod in the United States in 2005 and we sell the Omnipod directly to end users or through intermediaries. The Omnipod is also available in multiple countries in Europe, as well as in Canada and Israel. On July 1, 2018, we commenced direct commercial operations for the Omnipod in Europe immediately following the expiration of our distribution agreement with our former European distributor. In June 2018, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ("FDA") cleared for commercial sale our Omnipod DASH, which is our next generation digital mobile Omnipod platform within the Omnipod System family, featuring secured Bluetooth wireless technology for connectivity between the Pod and the color touchscreen smartph1 PDM. The DASH PDM is optimized for use with the CONTOUR NEXT 1 Blood Glucose (BG) Meter for the direct transfer of blood glucose readings to the PDM's bolus calculator. Bluetooth functionality will also provide connectivity to our smartph1 apps. We commenced a limited commercial release of Omnipod DASH in 2018 prior to a planned full market launch in the U.S. in the first half of 2019. For the year ended December 31, 2018, approximately 69% of our consolidated revenue was from sales in the United States and approximately 31% from international sales. In January 2018, the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services ( CMS ) issued guidance clarifying that Medicare Part D Plan Sponsors may provide coverage for products such as the Omnipod System under the Medicare Part D (prescription drug) program. During 2018, we began securing coverage with Medicare Part D carriers to ensure beneficiaries living with diabetes have access to the Omnipod System. Securing Medicare Part D coverage also provides a direct pathway to increased Medicaid coverage at the state level, as many state run Medicaid programs follow CMS prescription drug guidance to determine coverage. This increased Medicaid access allows access for lower income individuals and families for whom Omnipod had previously not been a covered option. In April 2018, we also significantly increased our market access when we secured in ne2rk coverage of Omnipod with UnitedHealthcare, the largest commercial payer in the United States. In addition to the diabetes market space, we have partnered with pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies to tailor the Omnipod System technology platform for the delivery of subcutaneous drugs across other therapeutic areas. The majority of our drug delivery revenue currently consists of sales of Pods used in Amgen's Neulasta Onpro kit, an innovative delivery system for Amgen white blood cell booster to help reduce the risk of infection during intense chemotherapy. 3 Table of Contents We have substantially completed the construction of a highly automated manufacturing facility in Acton, Massachusetts, with planned production out of the facility beginning in the first half of 2019. The facility also serves as our global headquarters. We expect that, following start up related activities, the new facility will allow us to lower our manufacturing costs, increase supply redundancy, add capacity closer to our largest customer base and support our growth trajectory. Market Opportunity Management of Diabetes Diabetes is a chronic, life threatening disease for which there is no known cure. It is caused by the body inability to produce or effectively utilize the horm1 insulin, which prevents the body from adequately regulating blood glucose levels. Glucose, the primary source of energy for cells, must be maintained at certain concentrations in the blood in order to permit optimal cell function and health. In people with diabetes, blood glucose levels fluctuate between very high levels, a condition known as hyperglycemia, and very low levels, a condition called hypoglycemia. Hyperglycemia can lead to serious short term complications, such as confusion, vomiting, dehydration and loss of consciousness and long term complications, such as blindness, kidney disease, nervous system disease, occlusive vascular diseases, stroke and cardiovascular disease, or death. Hypoglycemia can lead to confusion, loss of consciousness or death. Diabetes is typically classified as either Type 1 or Type 2 Type 1 diabetes is characterized by the body nearly complete inability to produce insulin. It is frequently diagnosed during childhood or adolescence. Individuals with Type 1 diabetes require daily insulin therapy to survive. It is estimated that approximately 1 million to 2 million people in the United States have Type 1 diabetes. Type 2 diabetes, the more common form, is characterized by the body inability to either properly utilize insulin or produce enough insulin. Historically, Type 2 diabetes has occurred in later adulthood, but its incidence is increasing among the younger population, due primarily to increasing obesity. Initially, many people with Type 2 diabetes attempt to manage their diabetes with improvements in diet, exercise and or oral medications. As their diabetes advances, some patients progress to multiple drug therapies, which often include insulin therapy. It is estimated that approximately 2 million to 3 million people in the United States have Type 2 diabetes that requires daily insulin administration. Throughout this Annual Report on Form 10 K, we refer to both Type 1 diabetes and insulin requiring Type 2 diabetes as insulin dependent diabetes. Diabetes Management Challenges Diabetes is often frustrating and difficult for patients to manage. Blood glucose levels can be affected by the carbohydrate and fat content of meals, exercise, stress, illness or impending illness, hormonal releases, variability in insulin absorption and changes in the effects of insulin on the body. For people with insulin dependent diabetes, many corrections, consisting of the administration of additional insulin or ingestion of additional carbohydrates, are needed throughout the day in order to maintain blood glucose levels within normal ranges. Achieving this result can be very difficult without multiple daily injections of insulin or insulin pump therapy. Patients attempting to control their blood glucose levels tightly to prevent the long term complications associated with fluctuations in blood glucose levels are at greater risk for overcorrection and the resultant hypoglycemia. As a result, many patients have difficulty managing their diabetes. Additionally, the time spent managing fluctuations in blood glucose levels and the fear associated with hypoglycemia can be incredibly stressful to patients and their families. Current Insulin Therapy People with insulin dependent diabetes need a continuous supply of insulin, known as basal insulin, to provide for background metabolic needs. In addition to basal insulin, people with insulin dependent diabetes require supplemental insulin, known as bolus insulin, to compensate for carbohydrates ingested during meals or snacks or for a high blood glucose level. As previously noted, there are 2 primary types of insulin therapy practiced today MDI therapy and insulin pump therapy. Insulin pumps are used to perform continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion and typically use a programmable device and an infusion set to administer insulin into the person body. MDI therapy involves the administration of fast acting insulin before meals (bolus) to lower blood glucose levels to a healthy range. MDI therapy may also require a separate injection of a long acting (basal) insulin, to control glucose levels between meals; typically once or twice per day. By comparison, insulin pump therapy uses only fast acting insulin to fulfill both mealtime (bolus) and background (basal) requirements. Insulin pump therapy allows individuals to customize their bolus and basal insulin doses to meet their insulin needs throughout the day, and is intended to more closely resemble the physiologic function of a healthy pancreas. Insulin pump therapy has been shown to provide numerous advantages relative to MDI therapy. For example, insulin pump therapy eliminates individual insulin injections (approximately five per day), delivers insulin more accurately and precisely than injections, often improves HbA1c (a common measure of blood glucose levels) over time, provides greater flexibility with meals, exercise and daily schedules, and can reduce severe low blood glucose levels. 4 Table of Contents We believe that these distinct advantages, including technological advancements and increased awareness of insulin pump therapy as compared to other available insulin therapies will continue to generate demand for insulin pump devices. Our Solution The Omnipod System The Omnipod System is an innovative continuous insulin delivery system that provides all the benefits of insulin pump therapy in a way no conventional insulin pump can. The Omnipod System's innovative design and differentiated features allow people with insulin dependent diabetes to live their lives, and manage their diabetes, with unprecedented freedom, comfort, convenience and ease. Pod Omnipod PDM Omnipod DASH PDM The Omnipod System is a discreet 2 part design, the Pod and the PDM, that eliminates the need for the external tubing required with conventional pumps. The Pod is a small, lightweight, self adhesive device that the user fills with insulin and wears directly on the body. The Pod delivers precise, personalized doses of insulin into the body through a small flexible tube (called a cannula), based on instructions that the patient programs into the Pod's wireless companion, the PDM. The PDM is a wireless, handheld device that programs the Pod with the user's personalized insulin delivery instructions and, wirelessly monitors the Pod's operation. The Omnipod System provides continuous insulin delivery at preset rates, eliminating the need for individual insulin injections and the interruptions that come with them. In addition, insulin delivery can be changed with the press of a button to adapt to snacks or unexpected changes in daily routine. The Omnipod System works much like the pancreas of a person without diabetes by delivering insulin in 2 ways A small, constant background supply of insulin is delivered automatically at a programmed rate, all day and night. An extra dose of insulin can be delivered when a patient needs it to match the carbohydrates in a meal or snacks or to correct high blood glucose. We have designed the Omnipod System to fit within the normal daily routines of patients. The Omnipod System consists of just 2 devices as opposed to up to seven for conventional tubed insulin pumps. As a result, the Omnipod System is easy for patients to use, which also reduces the training burden on healthcare professionals and end users. We believe that the Omnipod System overall ease of use, flexibility, and substantially lower training burden make it very attractive to people with insulin dependent diabetes and help redefine for whom insulin pump therapy is appropriate, allowing healthcare professionals to prescribe pump therapy to a broader group of patients. The Omnipod System unique patented design and proprietary manufacturing process allow us to provide pump therapy at a relatively low up front investment compared to conventional tubed insulin pumps. We believe that our pricing model, which includes little or no initial investment, reduces the risk to third party payors of significant up front investments commonly associated with traditional tubed insulin pumps. 5 Table of Contents Several publications over the past decade have found that compared to multiple daily injections therapy, the use of the Omnipod System by individuals with both Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes across all age groups is associated with good glycemic control, reduced total daily dose of insulin, and reduced frequency and severity of hypoglycemic episodes. These results are consistent with other published literature of other continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion devices similar to the Omnipod System. In addition, research in adults with Type 1 diabetes has found that compared to prior treatment modality, the use of the Omnipod System is associated with improved quality of life. We believe that this data is clinically meaningful to healthcare providers and provides support for the use of the Omnipod System in the treatment of both Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes. We have partnered with Glooko Inc. ("Glooko") to connect our Omnipod System user data with Glooko's comprehensive diabetes data management system (including Glooko and Diasend in selected regions). Glooko provides a cloud based application for clinicians and patients accessible through a kiosk, home computer or a mobile application on the user's smartph1 that provides patients and their health care providers access to insulin delivery trends, blood glucose levels and other integrated data. Third Party Reimbursement In the United States, our products are generally reimbursed by third party payors when sold directly to end users, and we bill those payors for products provided to end users. Prior to 2018, coverage was more limited in the United States due to the lack of an established mechanism for Medicare or broad Medicaid coverage for the majority of the Omnipod System. In January 2018, CMS issued guidance clarifying that Medicare Part D Plan Sponsors may provide coverage for products such as the Omnipod System under the Medicare Part D (prescription drug) program. We have been successful in securing coverage with Medicare Part D plans, which allows many additional people with diabetes to access our product. The ability of Medicare Part D plans to cover the Omnipod System also provides us with a direct pathway to gain Medicaid coverage at the state level, as many state run Medicaid look to Medicare to determine coverage. This allows access for lower income individuals and families on Medicaid for whom Omnipod is currently not an option. In addition, in April 2018, we also significantly increased our third party reimbursement when we secured in ne2rk coverage of Omnipod with UnitedHealthcare, the largest commercial payer in the United States. We continue to work with third party payors in the United States to establish coverage and payment for the Omnipod System. Our coverage contracts with third party payors typically have a term of between 1 and 3 years and set coverage amounts during that term. Typically, coverage contracts automatically renew for specified incremental periods upon expiration, unless 1 of the parties terminates the contract. Our fulfillment and reimbursement systems are fully integrated such that product is generally shipped only after confirmation of a physician valid statement of medical necessity and current health insurance information. We maintain an insurance benefits investigation department that works to simplify and expedite claims processing and to assist patients in obtaining third party reimbursement. Common medical criteria for third party payors approving reimbursement for pump therapy may include a patient having elevated A1c levels, a history of recurring hypoglycemia, fluctuations in blood glucose levels prior to meals or upon waking or, severe glycemic variability. Third party payors may decline to reimburse for procedures, supplies or services determined not to be medically necessary or reasonable. Reimbursement may also be declined by insurers based upon the contract between the insurer and the insured group. In Europe, in connection with of our recent assumption of direct operations in mid 2018, we have worked with local healthcare systems to establish coverage and payment processes for the Omnipod System. In certain non U.S. locations in which we sell through a distributor, our distribution partners establish appropriate reimbursement contracts with healthcare systems in those countries and provinces. Markets and Distribution Methods We sell the Omnipod directly to patients or indirectly through intermediaries, such as independent distributors and the pharmacy channel, in the United States, Canada, Europe, and Israel. In 2018, following FDA clearance, we also commenced a limited commercial release of Omnipod DASH directly to customers in the U.S. For the year ended December 31, 2018, approximately 46% of our Omnipod System sales in the United States were through intermediaries. Consistent with CMS decision in 2018 that products such as the Omnipod System are coverable under the Medicare Part D prescription drug benefit, we have been expanding access to our Omnipod System through the pharmacy channel, which we believe provides several competitive advantages over the durable medical equipment ("DME") distribution method used by traditional pump companies. Internationally, the majority of our sales are through intermediaries. Our sales and marketing efforts are focused on patient retention and growing patient, clinician and payor demand for the Omnipod System. We have a uniform sales and marketing approach, aligned across patients, physicians and providers, to capitalize on the unique benefits of our Omnipod System technology. We have 3 areas of focus 6 Table of Contents First, build patient awareness about the features and benefits that the Omnipod System provides. Second, build physician support by increasing the clinical evidence that demonstrates the benefits that the Omnipod System provides and improving the patient monitoring data available to physicians providing diabetes care. Third, provide payors with the clinical and economic justification for why the Omnipod System is a unique value to the patients whom they insure. Training. We believe that training patients how to use the Omnipod System is an important factor to promote successful outcomes and patient retention. We have streamlined and standardized our patient training by developing improved online resources and increased our field clinician team to directly train new Omnipod System customers. Customer Support. We seek to provide our customers with high quality customer support, from product ordering to insurance investigation, order fulfillment and ongoing support. We have integrated our customer support systems with our sales, reimbursement and billing processes and also offer support by teleph1 and through our website to provide customers with seamless and reliable support. Competition The diabetes medical device market is highly competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions. The Omnipod System competes for patients in the insulin delivery market. Because the majority of new Omnipod System end users come from MDI therapy, which currently is the most prevalent method of insulin delivery, we believe that we primarily compete with companies that provide MDI therapy. To a smaller extent, we also compete with companies in the insulin pump market, which today consists of conventional tubed pump companies, including Medtronic MiniMed, a division of Medtronic Public Limited Company ("Medtronic"), and Tandem Inc. Medtronic historically has held the majority share of the conventional tubed insulin pump market in the United States. The competitive landscape in our industry continues to undergo significant change. For example, Animas Corporation, a division of Johnson & Johnson, exited the insulin pump market in the United States and other countries in late 2017. In addition to the established insulin pump competitors, several companies are working to develop and market new insulin patch pumps and smart pens. These companies are at various stages of development and the number of such companies often changes as they enter or exit the market. Our non insulin drug delivery product line also competes with drug delivery device companies such as West Pharmaceutical Services, Inc. Research and Development Our current research and development efforts are primarily focused on making improvements to the Omnipod System, including adding features and functionality that will deliver economic value, convenience and simplicity to our customers, and improving our supply chain operations. These efforts include Omnipod DASH . We have developed Omnipod DASH, our next generation of the Omnipod System, which features a secure Bluetooth enabled Pod and PDM with a touch screen color user interface supported by smartph1 connectivity incorporating state of the art security features. Bluetooth functionality also provides connectivity to our smartph1 apps, allowing users and those they approve (e.g. caregivers) to view their Omnipod DASH data on their personal smartph1s. In June 2018, the FDA provided clearance for the commercial distribution of DASH in the U.S. We commenced a limited commercial release of DASH in 2018 and expect to commence a full market launch in the U.S. in the first half of 2019. Omnipod Horizon TM Automated Insulin Delivery System ("Omnipod Horizon System") . We also are developing a hybrid closed loop control system that utilizes the DASH mobile platform to allow the Pod to communicate with Dexcom Inc.'s ("Dexcom") continuous glucose monitor and help control insulin delivery utilizing an algorithm located on the Pod. The Omnipod Horizon System is intended to be controllable through a secure mobile app on the user's smartph1 (i.e. "ph1 control"). In July 2018, we announced positive results from a clinical trial finding that the Omnipod Horizon System performed well and was safe for over five days of use in adults, adolescents, and children with Type 1 diabetes. The Omnipod Horizon System recently was granted designation in the FDA's breakthrough device program, which is a program intended to help patients have more timely access to certain medical devices and device led combination products that provide for more effective treatment or diagnosis of life threatening or irreversibly debilitating diseases or conditions by expediting the development and review process. We believe that recent and ongoing developments in the use of Continuous Glucose Monitoring ("CGM") technology and Automated Insulin Delivery ("AID") algorithms in conjunction with insulin pump therapy will continue to provide people with insulin dependent diabetes benefits that will make insulin pump therapy an even more attractive treatment alternative to the existing MDI therapy market. Paramount to our ability to deliver ph1 control is our commitment to cyber and information security. Just recently, Omnipod DASH became the first FDA cleared insulin pump to be certified under the Diabetes Technology Society Standard for 7 Table of Contents Wireless Diabetes Device Security cybersecurity assurance standard and program, known as DTSec. This certification is a cybersecurity standard with the goal of raising confidence in the security of ne2rk connected medical devices through independent expert evaluation. In addition, Omnipod DASH recently received International Standards Organization ("ISO") 27001 certification, which is the international standard for best practice in an information security management system globally. With the DTSec and ISO 27001 certifications, Omnipod DASH is now globally recognized for incorporating the highest standards for cyber and information security and safety, including secure data transfer between the Pod and PDM, as well as secure cloud storage. Concentrated Insulin Delivery . In collaboration with Eli Lilly, we are developing new products that leverage the DASH mobile platform to support the use of concentrated insulins for Type 1 and Type 2 patients with higher insulin requirements, utilizing the same form factor as our existing Pod. These new products are being specifically designed to deliver Humalog 200 units mL and Humulin R U 500 insulin, which are concentrated forms of insulin used by people with highly insulin resistant Type 2 diabetes. Together with our Omnipod DASH System, we believe these innovations significantly expand our access to more of the Type 2 diabetes market. Supply Chain Operation Improvements. We continue to invest in improvements and efficiencies to our entire supply chain, including improvements in automation at our suppliers and contract manufacturer as well as our U.S. manufacturing facility in Acton, Massachusetts, set to commence manufacturing in the first half of 2019. Manufacturing and Quality Assurance We believe a key contributing factor to the overall attractiveness and success of the Omnipod System is the disposable nature of the Pod. In order to manufacture sufficient volumes and achieve a cost effective per unit production price for the Omnipod, we have designed the Omnipod System to be manufactured through automation. We produce our devices on varying degrees of semi automated manufacturing lines at a facility in China, operated by a subsidiary of Flex Ltd. ( Flex ) pursuant to a multi year materials supply agreement. The agreement expires in December 2022 and is subject to an automatic renewal thereafter, unless otherwise canceled by the parties under the contract terms. We have substantially completed the construction of a highly automated manufacturing facility that we own and will operate in Acton, Massachusetts. This facility now serves as our global headquarters and we plan to produce devices there beginning in the first half of 2019. We expect that, following start up related activities, the new facility will allow us to lower our manufacturing costs, increase supply redundancy, add capacity closer to our largest customer base, and support our strong growth trajectory. To date, we have invested approximately $193 million in property, equipment and infrastructure related to the new facility. We expect to continue to expand our investment in this facility in 2019 to support the growth of our business. We utilize outside vendors for the supply of comp1nts, sub assemblies, and various services used in the manufacture of the Omnipod System. Our outside vendors produce the comp1nts to our specifications and they are audited periodically by our Quality Assurance Department to confirm conformity with the specifications, policies and procedures for the Omnipod System. Our Quality Assurance Department also inspects and tests the Omnipod System at various steps in the manufacturing cycle to facilitate compliance with our specifications. We have received approval of our Quality Management System from the BSI Group London, U.K., an accredited Notified Body for CE Marking and the International Standards Organization. Processes utilized in the manufacture, test and release of the Omnipod System have been verified and validated as required by the FDA and other regulatory bodies. As a medical device manufacturer and distributor, our manufacturing facilities and the facilities of our suppliers are subject to periodic inspection by the FDA and certain corresponding state agencies. Intellectual Property To maintain a competitive advantage, we believe we must develop and preserve the proprietary aspect of our technologies. We rely on a combination of copyright, patent, trademark, trade secret and other intellectual property laws, non disclosure agreements and other measures to protect our proprietary rights. Currently, we require our employees, consultants and advisers to execute non disclosure agreements in connection with their employment, consulting or advisory relationships with us, where appropriate. We also require employees, consultants and advisers who work on our products to agree to disclose and assign to us all inventions conceived during their work with us that are developed using our property or relate to our business. Despite any measures taken to protect our intellectual property, unauthorized parties may attempt to copy aspects of the Omnipod System or to obtain and use information that we regard as proprietary. Patents. As of December 31, 2018 , we had 21 granted and active U.S. patents with expiration dates ranging from 2020 through 2034, and had 56 additional pending U.S. patent applications. We believe that it will take at least several years for the most recent of these U.S. patent applications to result in issued patents. We are also seeking patent protection for our proprietary technology in other countries and regions throughout the world. The issued patents and pending patent applications cover, among other things 8 Table of Contents the basic architecture of the Omnipod System, including the pump and the PDM; the Omnipod shape memory alloy drive system; the Omnipod System cannula insertion system; communication features between system comp1nts for the Omnipod System and next generation products; software, such as apps, for controlling the Omnipod System and next generation products; and various novel aspects of the Omnipod System, potential future generations of Omnipod Systems, and other mechanisms for the delivery of pharmaceuticals. Trademarks. We have registered various trademarks associated with our business with the United States Patent and Trademark Office on the Principal Register and in other appropriate jurisdictions. Our trademarks include OMNIPOD (R) , DASH TM , Omnipod CONTROL TM , Omnipod DISPLAY TM , Omnipod VIEW TM , Omnipod OMNIPOD U 200 TM , OMNIPOD U 500 TM , HORIZON TM , Pod Pals TM and Podder TM . Government Regulation United States FDA Regulation The Omnipod System is a medical device subject to extensive and ongoing regulation by the FDA and other federal, state, and local regulatory bodies. FDA regulations govern, among other things, product design and development, preclinical and clinical testing, manufacturing, labeling, post market adverse event reporting, post market surveillance, complaint handling, repair or recall of products, product storage, record keeping, pre market clearance or approval, advertising and promotion, and sales and distribution. FDA Pre Market Notification 510(k) and Pre Market Approval Requirements. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we seek to commercially distribute in the United States will require either prior 510(k) clearance or pre market approval ( PMA ) from the FDA. We have obtained 510(k) clearance for the Omnipod and Omnipod DASH Systems and expect that PMA approval may be needed for some of our future products. We may be required to obtain a new 510(k) clearance or pre market approval for significant post market modifications to our products. Both the 510(k) clearance and PMA processes can be expensive and lengthy and entail significant user fees, unless an exemption is available. 510(k) Clearance . To obtain 510(k) clearance for any of our potential future devices (or for certain modifications to devices that have previously received 510(k) clearance), we must submit a pre market notification demonstrating that the proposed device is substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device. The FDA 510(k) clearance pathway generally takes from 3 to twelve months from the date the application is completed, but can take significantly longer. After a medical device receives 510(k) clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a significant change in its intended use, requires a new 510(k) clearance or, depending on the modification, could require a PMA application. The FDA requires each manufacturer to make this determination initially, but the FDA can review any such decision and can disagree with a manufacturer determination. If the FDA disagrees with a manufacturer determination regarding whether a new premarket submission is required for the modification of an existing device, the FDA can, at its discretion, require the manufacturer to cease marketing and or recall the modified device until 510(k) clearance or approval of a PMA application is obtained. In addition, in these circumstances, we may be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties for failure to submit the requisite PMA application(s). PMA. Devices deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device generally require a PMA before they can be commercially distributed. A PMA application must be supported by extensive data, including technical information, pre clinical and clinical trials, manufacturing and labeling to demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of the device to the FDA satisfaction. After a PMA application is complete, the FDA begins an in depth review of the submitted information, which generally takes between 1 and 3 years, but may take significantly longer. During this review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of information already provided. Also during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA as to the approvability of the device. The FDA will conduct a pre approval inspection of the manufacturing facility to ensure compliance with Quality System Regulations, or QSRs, which impose elaborate design development, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures in the design and manufacturing process. The FDA may approve a PMA application with post approval conditions intended to ensure the safety and effectiveness of the device including, among other things, restrictions on labeling, promotion, sale and distribution and collection of long term follow up data from patients in the clinical study that supported approval. Failure to comply with the conditions of approval can result in materially adverse enforcement action, including the loss or withdrawal of the approval. After any pre market approval, a new pre market approval application or application supplement may be required in the event of modifications to the device, its labeling, intended use or 9 Table of Contents indication or its manufacturing process. PMA supplements often require submission of the same type of information as a PMA application, except that the supplement is limited to information needed to support any changes from the device covered by the original PMA application, and may not require as extensive clinical data or the convening of an advisory panel. Clinical Trials. Clinical trials are almost always required to support a PMA application and sometimes also 510(k) submissions. If the device presents a significant risk to human health as defined by the FDA, the FDA requires the device sponsor to submit an investigational device exemption ("IDE") to the FDA and obtain IDE approval prior to commencing the human clinical trials. The IDE must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of patients, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device, in which case an IDE approval from the FDA would not be required, although the clinical trial would need to meet other requirements including IRB approval. Clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once an IDE is approved by the FDA and the appropriate Institutional Review Board ("IRB") at each clinical trial site. Future clinical trials may require that we obtain an IDE from the FDA prior to commencing any such clinical trial and that the trial be conducted with the oversight of an IRB at the clinical trial site. Our clinical trials must be conducted in accordance with FDA regulations and federal and state regulations concerning human subject protection, including informed consent and healthcare privacy. A clinical trial may be suspended by the FDA or at a specific site by the relevant IRB at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to the trial participants outweigh the benefits of participation in the clinical trial. Even if a clinical trial is completed, the results of our clinical testing may not demonstrate the safety and efficacy of the device, or may be equivocal or otherwise not be sufficient for us to obtain approval of our product. Ongoing Regulation by FDA. Even after a device is placed on the market, regardless of its classification or premarket pathway, numerous regulatory requirements apply. These include, but are not limited to establishment registration and device listing; quality system regulation, or QSR, which requires manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow stringent design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during all aspects of the development and manufacturing process; labeling regulations and FDA prohibitions against the promotion of products for uncleared, unapproved or off label uses, and other requirements related to promotional activities; medical device reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA if their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction were to recur; corrections and removals reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act that may present a risk to health. In addition, FDA may order a mandatory recall if there is a reasonable probability that the device would cause serious adverse health consequences or death; and post market surveillance regulations, which apply when necessary to protect the public health or to provide additional safety and effectiveness data for the device. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements can result in enforcement actions by the FDA and other regulatory agencies, which may include any of the following sanctions untitled letters or warning letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees, civil or criminal penalties, recall or seizure of our current or future products, operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production, refusal of or delay in granting 510(k) clearance or PMA approval of new products or modified products, rescinding previously granted 510(k) clearances or withdrawing previously granted PMA approvals, or refusal to grant import or export approval of our products. We are subject to announced and unannounced inspections by the FDA, and these inspections may include the manufacturing facilities of our subcontractors. If, as a result of these inspections, the FDA determines that our equipment, facilities, laboratories or processes do not comply with applicable FDA regulations and conditions of product approval, the FDA may seek civil, criminal or administrative sanctions and or remedies against us, including the suspension of our manufacturing operations. Since approval of the Omnipod System, we have been subject to FDA inspections of our facility on multiple occasions. International Product Regulations 10 Table of Contents International sales of medical devices are subject to foreign government regulations, which may vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain approval by a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA clearance or approval, and the requirements may differ. There is a trend towards harmonization of quality system standards among the European Union, United States, Canada and various other industrialized countries. The primary regulatory body in Europe is that of the European Union, which includes most of the major countries in Europe. Other countries, such as Switzerland, have voluntarily adopted laws and regulations that mirror those of the European Union with respect to medical devices. The European Union has adopted numerous directives and standards regulating the design, manufacture, clinical trials, labeling and adverse event reporting for medical devices, including the Medical Device Directive ("MDD"). Devices that comply with the requirements of a relevant directive will be entitled to bear the CE conformity marking, indicating that the device conforms to the essential requirements of the applicable directives and, accordingly, can be commercially distributed throughout Europe. The method of assessing conformity varies depending on the class of the product, but normally involves a combination of self assessment by the manufacturer and a third party assessment by a Notified Body. This third party assessment may consist of an audit of the manufacturer quality system and specific testing of the manufacturer product. An assessment by a Notified Body of 1 country within the European Union is required in order for a manufacturer to commercially distribute the product throughout the European Union. Outside of the European Union, regulatory approval needs to be sought on a country by country basis in order for us to market our products. We have obtained the right to affix the CE Mark to the Omnipod and Omnipod DASH Systems. The CE Mark gives us authorization to distribute these products throughout the European Union and in other countries that recognize the CE Mark. In September 2009, we received Health Canada approval to distribute the Omnipod throughout Canada. We have been distributing the Omnipod in certain countries in Europe through intermediaries or directly to end users since 2010. Other Regulations Licensure. Several states require that DME providers be licensed in order to sell products to patients in that state. Certain of these states require, among other things, that DME providers maintain an in state location. In order to sell our product through the pharmacy channel, we are required to work with intermediaries who have the appropriate pharmacy license for the applicable market in which we provide customers with access to our product through the pharmacy. In addition, we are subject to certain state laws regarding professional licensure. We believe that our certified diabetes educators are in compliance with all such state laws. However, if our educators or we were to be found non compliant in a given state, we may need to modify our approach to providing education, clinical support and customer service. Federal Anti Kickback and Self Referral Laws. The federal healthcare Anti Kickback Statute prohibits the knowing and willful offer, payment, solicitation or receipt of any form of remuneration (anything of value) in return for, or to induce the referral of an individual; furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of Item or services reimbursable under Medicare, Medicaid or other federal health care programs; or the purchase, lease, or order of, or the arrangement or recommendation of the purchasing, leasing, or ordering of, any item or service reimbursable under Medicare, Medicaid or other federal health care programs. The federal Anti Kickback Statute has been interpreted to apply to arrangements between drug and medical device manufacturers and suppliers on 1 hand and prescribers, patients, purchasers and formulary managers on the other. Liability under the statute may be established without a person or entity having actual knowledge of the statute or specific intent to violate it. In addition, claims resulting from a violation of the federal Anti Kickback Statute constitute false or fraudulent claims for purposes of the federal civil False Claims Act, which is addressed below. Although there are a number of statutory exemptions and regulatory safe harbors protecting certain common business practices from prosecution and administrative sanctions, the exemptions and safe harbors are drawn narrowly, and practices that involve remuneration that may be perceived as inducing the prescription, purchase, or recommendation of the Omnipod System may be subject to scrutiny under the law. For example, we provide the initial training to patients necessary for appropriate use of the Omnipod System either through our own diabetes educators or by contracting with outside diabetes educators that have completed a Certified Pod Trainer training course. We compensate outside diabetes educators for their services at contracted rates deemed to be consistent with the market. We have structured our arrangements with diabetes educators and other business practices to comply with statutory exemptions and regulatory safe harbors whenever possible, but our practices may be subject to scrutiny if they fail to strictly comply with the criteria in the exemption or regulatory safe harbor. Moreover, there are no safe harbors for many common practices such providing reimbursement assistance, coding and billing information or other patient assistance and product support programs. If any of our practices, arrangements or programs are found not to be in compliance with the federal Anti Kickback Statute, we can be subject to significant criminal, civil and administrative penalties, including imprisonment, fines, damages, and exclusion 11 Table of Contents from Medicare, Medicaid or other governmental programs, any of which could have an adverse effect on our business and results of operations. Federal law also includes a provision commonly known as the Stark Law, which prohibits a physician from referring Medicare or Medicaid patients to an entity for the furnishing of certain designated health services, including durable medical equipment, in which the physician has an ownership or investment interest or with which the physician has entered into a compensation arrangement. Violation of the Stark Law could result in denial of payment, disgorgement of reimbursements received for Item and services referred by a physician with a noncompliant arrangement, civil damages and penalties, and exclusion from Medicare, Medicaid or other governmental programs. Although there are a number of statutory and regulatory exceptions protecting certain common business practices implicating the Stark Law, and we have structured our arrangements with physicians and other providers to comply with these exceptions, these arrangements may not expressly meet the requirements for applicable exceptions from the law. Federal civil False Claims Act. The federal civil False Claims Act imposes penalties against any person or entity who, among other things, knowingly presents, or causes to be presented, a false or fraudulent claim for payment of government funds or knowingly making, using or causing to be made or used a false record or statement material to a false or fraudulent claim. Actions under the False Claims Act may be brought by the Attorney General or as a qui tam action by a private individual in the name of the government. Violations of the False Claims Act are subject to the imposition of significant per claim penalties, 3 times the amount of damages that the federal government sustained and possible exclusion from participation in federal health care programs like Medicare and Medicaid. We believe that we are in compliance with the federal government laws and regulations concerning the filing of claims for reimbursement. However, many drug and medical device manufacturers have been investigated or subject to lawsuits by whistleblowers and have reached substantial financial settlements with the federal government under the False Claims Act for a variety of alleged improper marketing activities, including providing free product to customers with the expectation that the customers would bill federal programs for the product; or causing submission of false claims by providing inaccurate coding or billing information to actual or prospective purchasers, and our business practices could be subject to scrutiny and enforcement under the federal False Claims Act. We also may be subject to other federal false claim laws, including federal criminal statutes that prohibit making a false statement to the federal government. Civil M1tary Penalties Law. We are also subject to the federal Civil M1tary Penalties Law, which prohibits, among other things, the offering or transferring of remuneration to a Medicare or Medicaid beneficiary that the person knows or should know is likely to influence the beneficiary selection of a particular supplier of Medicare or Medicaid payable Item or services. Noncompliance can result in significant civil m1y penalties for each wrongful act, assessment of 3 times the amount claimed for each item or service and exclusion from the federal healthcare programs. Federal Health Care Fraud Statutes. We are also subject to a federal health care fraud statute that, among other things, imposes criminal and civil liability for executing a scheme to defraud any health care benefit program including non governmental programs, and prohibits knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false or fraudulent statement or representation, or making or using any false writing or document with knowledge that it contains a materially false or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for health care benefits, Item or services. Violations of these statutes can result in significant civil, criminal and administrative penalties, fines, damages, and exclusion from federal health care programs. State Fraud and Abuse Laws and Marketing Restrictions. Many states have also adopted anti kickback, anti referral laws, and false claims laws and regulations analogous to the federal civil Anti Kickback Statute and federal False Claims Act, and in some cases these state laws apply regardless of the payer, including private payors. We believe that we are in conformance with such laws. Moreover, several states have imposed requirements to disclose payments to health care providers, restrictions on marketing and other expenditures, and requirements to adopt a code of conduct or compliance program with specific elements. Liability under such laws could result in fines and penalties and restrictions on our ability to operate in these jurisdictions. Administrative Simplification of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ( HIPAA ) mandated the adoption of standards for the exchange of electronic health information in an effort to encourage overall administrative simplification and enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of the healthcare industry. Ensuring privacy and security of patient information is 1 of the key factors driving the legislation. If we are found to be in violation of HIPAA, we could be subject to civil or criminal penalties. 12 Table of Contents General Data Protection Regulation. The General Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR") is a comprehensive update to the data protection regime in the European Economic Area that is effective in fiscal 2018. The GDPR imposes new requirements relating to, among other things, consent to process personal data of individuals, the information provided to individuals regarding the processing of their personal data, the security and confidentiality of personal data, notifications in the event of data breaches and use of third party processors. If we fail to comply with these standards, we could be subject to criminal penalties and civil sanctions, including fines and penalties for noncompliance with the GDPR. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act . The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 ( ACA ) enacted significant changes to the provision of and payment for healthcare in the United States. Under the ACA and related laws and regulations, federal and state government initiatives are focused on limiting the growth of healthcare costs and implementing changes to healthcare delivery structures. These reforms are intended in part to put increased emphasis on the delivery to patients of more cost effective therapies and could adversely affect our business. Some of the provisions of the ACA have yet to be fully implemented, and certain provisions have been subject to judicial and Congressional challenges. In addition, there have been efforts by the Trump administration to repeal or replace certain aspects of the ACA and to alter the implementation of the ACA and related laws. It is unclear how the ACA and its implementation, as well as efforts to repeal or replace, or invalidate, the ACA, or portions thereof, will affect our business. Additional legislative changes, regulatory changes, and judicial challenges related to the ACA remain possible. While some uncertainty exists regarding the future aspects of the ACA, we expect that the ACA will continue to have a significant impact on the delivery of healthcare in the United States and on our business in the near term. Physician Payments Sunshine Act . The Physician Payments Sunshine Act, implemented as the Open Payments program, requires manufacturers of drugs and devices for which payment is available under Medicare, Medicaid, or the Children Health Insurance Program (with certain exceptions) to report annually to CMS information related to direct or indirect payments and other transfers of value provided to physicians and teaching hospitals, as well as ownership and investment interests held by physician and their immediate family members. Beginning in 2022, applicable manufacturers also will be required to report information regarding payments and transfers of value provided to physician assistants, nurse practiti1rs, clinical nurse specialists, certified nurse anesthetists, and certified nurse midwives. Our failure to disclose reportable payments could subject us to penalties and materially adversely impact our business and financial results. Additionally, as these laws and regulations continue to evolve, we lack definitive guidance as to the application of certain key aspects of these laws and regulations as they relate to certain of our arrangements and programs, including those with providers with respect to patient training. We cannot predict the final form of these federal and state regulations or the effect that application of those interpretations will have on us. As a result, our provider and training arrangements may ultimately be found not to be in compliance with applicable federal law. Moreover, these laws continue to evolve. The Bipartisan Budget Act of 2018 increased the criminal and civil penalties that can be imposed for violating certain federal health care laws, including the Anti Kickback Statute. Most recently, on February 6, 2019, the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office of the Inspector General ( OIG ) issued a proposed rule to remove protection from the discount safe harbor to the federal healthcare Anti Kickback Statute for manufacturers rebates to pharmacy benefit managers (or PBMs ), Medicare Part D plans, and Medicaid managed care organizations (MCOs). The rule also proposes a new safe harbor for point of sale reductions offered by manufacturers to Part D plans, Medicaid MCOs and their PBMs, and a new safe harbor for certain fees manufacturers pay to PBMs for services to the manufacturers. If finalized, the rule will be 1 of the most significant amendments to the Anti Kickback Statute regulatory safe harbors in decades and likely will transform manufacturer interactions with Part D plans, Medicaid MCOs and their PBMs. Ensuring that our business arrangements and interactions with healthcare professionals, third party payors, patients and others comply with applicable healthcare laws and regulations requires substantial resources. Because of the breadth of these laws and the narrowness of the exceptions or safe harbors, it is possible that some of our business activities could be subject to challenge under 1 or more of such laws. Such a challenge could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Even if we are not found to have violated the law, responding to lawsuits, government investigations or enforcement actions, defending any claims raised, and paying any resulting settlement amounts would be expensive and time consuming, and could have a material adverse effect on our reputation and business operations. Employees As of December 31, 2018 , we had 1,169 full time employees. N1 of our employees are represented by a collective bargaining agreement, and we have never experienced any work stoppage. We believe that our employee relations are strong. Company Information 13 Table of Contents Insulet Corporation is a Delaware corporation formed in 2000. Our principal office is located at 100 Nagog Park, Acton, Massachusetts, 01720 and our website address is http www.insulet.com . We make available, free of charge, on or through our website, our annual reports on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K, proxy statements and any amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, as soon as reasonably practicable after such material is electronically filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. The information on our website is not part of this Annual Report on Form 10 K for the year ended December 31, 2018. Item 1A. Risk Factors This Annual Report on Form 10 K contains forward looking statements. Forward looking statements relate to future events or our future financial performance. We generally identify forward looking statements by terminology such as may, will, should, expects, plans, anticipates, could, intends, targets, projects, contemplates, believes, estimates, predicts, potential or continue or the negative of these terms or other similar words. These statements are only predictions. We have based these forward looking statements largely on our current expectations and projections about future events and financial trends that we believe may affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. The outcomes of the events described in these forward looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and other factors described in this Item 1A Risk Factors and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Accordingly, you should not rely upon forward looking statements as predictions of future events. We cannot assure you that the events and circumstances reflected in the forward looking statements will be achieved or occur, and actual results could differ materially from those projected in the forward looking statements. The forward looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10 K relate only to events as of the date of this report. We undertake no obligation to update any forward looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which the statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. Risks Relating to Our Business Although we achieved operating income and net income in 2018, we previously incurred significant operating and net losses since inception and cannot assure you that we will sustain profitability. Prior to 2018 and since our inception in 2000, we incurred significant operating losses. For the year ended December 31, 2018 , we generated operating income of $27.4 million and net income of $33 million . Our net losses for the years ended December 31, 2017 , 2016 and 2015 were $26.8 million , $28.9 million and $7352 million , respectively. The extent of any future net losses and the timing of profitability are uncertain, and we may not sustain profitability. As of December 31, 2018 , we had an accumulated deficit of $6836 million . We may experience significant fluctuations in our quarterly results of operations. The fluctuations in our quarterly results of operations have resulted, and may continue to result, from numerous factors, including delays in shipping due to capacity constraints; practices of health insurance companies and other third party payors with respect to reimbursement for our current or future products; market acceptance of our products; our ability to manufacture our products efficiently, or at all; transitions in our distribution channel; timing of regulatory approvals and clearances; new product introductions; competition; and timing of research and development expenditures. These factors, some of which are not within our control, may cause the price of our stock to fluctuate substantially. In particular, if our quarterly results of operations fail to meet or exceed the expectations of securities analysts or investors, our stock price could drop suddenly and significantly. We believe the quarterly comparisons of our financial results should not be the only indication of our future performance. 14 Table of Contents We currently rely on sales of the Omnipod System, and tailored versions of the Omnipod System in our drug delivery product line, to generate nearly all of our revenue. The failure of the Omnipod System to achieve and maintain significant market acceptance or any factors that negatively impact sales of this product will adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our main product is the Omnipod System, which we introduced to the market in 2005. We expect to continue to derive nearly all of our revenue from the sale of this product. Accordingly, our ability to continue to generate revenue is highly reliant on our ability to market and sell the Omnipod System and to retain customers who currently use the product. Our sales of the Omnipod System may be negatively impacted by many factors, including the failure of the Omnipod System to achieve and maintain wide acceptance among opinion leaders in the diabetes treatment community, insulin prescribing physicians, third party payors and people with insulin dependent diabetes; manufacturing problems or capacity constraints; actual or perceived quality problems; reductions in reimbursement rates or coverage policies relating to the Omnipod System by third party payors; claims that any portion of the Omnipod System infringes on patent rights or other intellectual property rights owned by other parties; adverse regulatory or legal actions relating to the Omnipod System; damage, destruction or loss of any of the facilities where our products are manufactured or stored or of the equipment therein or failure to successfully open or expand new facilities; conversion rate of patient referrals to actual sales of the Omnipod System; the inability of our customers to continue paying for our products; attrition rates of customers who cease using the Omnipod System; competitive pricing and related factors; and results of clinical studies relating to the Omnipod System or our competitors products. If any of these events occurs, our ability to generate revenue could be significantly reduced. Our ability to sustain profitability may depend on our ability to sustain or further reduce the per unit cost of producing the Omnipod System by increasing customer orders, increasing manufacturing volume and productivity and reducing raw material and overhead costs per unit. To sustain profitability, we may need to, among other things, sustain or further reduce the per unit cost of the Omnipod System. If we are unable to sustain or further reduce raw material and manufacturing overhead costs through volume purchase discounts, negotiation of improved pricing and increased productivity and production capacity, our ability to sustain profitability could be negatively affected. The occurrence of 1 or more factors that negatively impact the manufacturing or sales of the Omnipod System or increase our raw material costs could prevent us from sustaining our desired increase in manufacturing volume, which would prevent us from sustaining and further increasing profitability. Adverse changes in general economic conditions in the United States and outside of the United States, predominantly in Europe, could adversely affect us. We are subject to the risks arising from adverse changes in general economic market conditions. A U.S. or global recession, could negatively impact our current and prospective customers, adversely affect the financial ability of health insurers to pay claims, adversely impact our ability to pay our expenses and ability to obtain financing of our operations, cause delays or other problems with key suppliers and increase the risk of counterparty failures. Healthcare spending in the United States, Canada and Europe could be negatively affected in the event of a downturn in economic conditions. For example, U.S. patients who have lost their jobs or healthcare coverage may no longer be covered by an employer sponsored health insurance plan and patients reducing their overall spending may eliminate purchases requiring co payments. Since the sale of the Omnipod System to a new patient is generally dependent on the availability of third party reimbursement and normally requires the patient to make a significant co payment, an economic downturn on our potential customers could reduce the referrals generated by our sales force and thereby reduce our customer orders. Similarly, existing customers could cease purchasing the Omnipod System and return to MDI or other less costly therapies, which would cause our attrition rate to increase. Any decline in new customer orders or increase in our customer attrition rate would reduce our revenue, which in turn would make it more difficult to achieve our per unit cost savings goals, which we are attempting to attain in part through increases in our manufacturing volume. 15 Table of Contents Healthcare reform laws could adversely affect our revenue and financial condition. During the past several years, the U.S. healthcare industry has been subject to an increase in governmental regulation at both the federal and state levels. Efforts to control healthcare costs, including limiting access to care, alternative delivery models and changes in the methods used to determine reimbursement scenarios and rates, are ongoing at the federal and state government levels. There are provisions of law that provide for the creation of a new public private Patient Centered Outcomes Research Institute tasked with identifying comparative effectiveness research priorities. For example, establishing a research project agenda and contracting with entities to conduct the research in accordance with the agenda. Research findings published by this institute are publicly disseminated. It is difficult at this time to determine whether a comparative effectiveness analysis impacting our business will be d1, and assuming 1 is, what impact that analysis will have on the Omnipod System or our future financial results. Sales of certain medical devices are subject to a 23% federal excise tax, subject to a suspension through 2019. We believe that the sales of our products are exempt from this excise tax. However, if it is subsequently determined that sales of 1 or more of our products are subject to this excise tax, these tax obligations could adversely affect our financial results. In addition, the Affordable Care Act and related healthcare reform laws, regulations and initiatives have significantly increased regulation of managed care plans and decreased reimbursement to Medicare managed care. Some of these initiatives purport to, among other things, require that health plan members have greater access to drugs not included on a plan formulary. Moreover, to alleviate budget shortfalls, states have reduced or frozen payments to Medicaid managed care plans. We cannot accurately predict the complete impact of these healthcare reform initiatives, but they could lead to a decreased demand for our products and other outcomes that could adversely impact our business and financial results. Some of the provisions of the ACA have yet to be fully implemented, and certain provisions have been subject to judicial and Congressional challenges. In addition, there have been efforts by the Trump administration to repeal or replace certain aspects of the ACA and to alter the implementation of the ACA and related laws. For example, the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act enacted on December 22, 2017, eliminated the shared responsibility payment for individuals who fail to maintain minimum essential coverage under section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, commonly referred to as the "individual mandate", effective January 1, 2019. Further, the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2018 among other things, amended the Medicare statute, effective January 1, 2019, to reduce the coverage gap in most Medicare drug plans, commonly known as the donut hole, by raising the manufacturer discount under the Medicare Part D coverage gap discount program to 70%. It is unclear how the ACA and its implementation, as well as efforts to repeal or replace, or invalidate, the ACA, or portions thereof, will affect our business. Additional legislative changes, regulatory changes, and judicial challenges related to the ACA remain possible. It is possible that the ACA, as currently enacted or as it may be amended in the future, and other healthcare reform measures that may be adopted in the future, could have an adverse effect on our industry generally and on our ability to maintain or increase sales of any of our products and achieve profitability. We may need to raise additional funds in the future, and these funds may not be available on acceptable terms or at all. Our capital requirements will depend on many factors, including revenue generated by sales of our current products and any other future products that we may develop; costs associated with adding further manufacturing capacity; costs associated with expanding our sales and marketing efforts in the United States and internationally; expenses we incur in manufacturing and selling our products; costs of developing new products or technologies and enhancements to our products; the cost of obtaining and maintaining FDA approval or clearance of our current or future products; costs associated with any expansion; the cost of complying with regulatory requirements; costs associated with capital expenditures; costs associated with litigation; and the number and timing of any acquisitions or other strategic transactions. We believe that our current cash, cash equivalents and short term investments of $288.9 million , together with the cash to be generated from expected product sales, will be sufficient to meet our projected operating requirements through at least the end of 2019. We may in the future seek additional funds from public and private stock offerings, borrowings under credit lines or other sources. We may need to raise additional debt or equity financing to repay our outstanding Senior Convertible Notes. If we 16 Table of Contents issue equity or debt securities to raise additional funds, our existing stockholders may experience dilution, and the new equity or debt securities may have rights, preferences and privileges senior to those of our existing stockholders. In addition, if we raise additional funds through collaboration, licensing or other similar arrangements, it may be necessary to relinquish valuable rights to our potential future products or proprietary technologies, or grant licenses on terms that are not favorable to us. Our ability to raise additional capital may be adversely impacted by current economic conditions, including the effects of any disruptions to the credit and financial markets in the United States and worldwide. As a result of these and other factors, we do not know whether additional capital will be available when needed, or that, if available, we will be able to obtain additional capital on terms favorable to us or our stockholders. If we are unable to raise additional capital due to these or other factors, we may need to further manage our operational expenses to reflect these external factors, including potentially curtailing our planned development activities. If we cannot raise additional funds in the future on acceptable terms, we may not be able to develop new products, execute our business plan, take advantage of future opportunities or respond to competitive pressures or unanticipated customer requirements. If any of these events occur, it could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. We may not be able to generate sufficient cash to service our indebtedness represented by our Convertible Senior Notes. We may be forced to take other actions to satisfy our obligations under our indebtedness or we may experience a financial failure. As of December 31, 2018, we had outstanding principal amounts due of $747.5 million on our Convertible Senior Notes, which mature between 2021 and 2024. Our ability to make scheduled payments or to refinance the Convertible Senior Notes or other debt obligations depends on our financial and operating performance, which is subject to prevailing economic and competitive conditions and to certain financial, business and other factors beyond our control. We cannot assure you that we will maintain a level of cash flows from operating activities sufficient to permit us to pay the principal, premium, if any, and interest on our indebtedness. If our cash flows and capital resources are insufficient to fund our debt service obligations, we may be forced to reduce or delay capital expenditures, sell assets or operations, seek additional capital or restructure or refinance our indebtedness, including the outstanding Convertible Senior Notes. We cannot assure you that we would be able to take any of these actions, that these actions would be successful and permit us to meet our scheduled debt service obligations or that these actions would be permitted under the terms of our future debt agreements. In the absence of sufficient operating results and resources, we could face substantial liquidity problems and might be required to dispose of material assets or operations to meet our debt service and other obligations. We may not be able to consummate those dispositions or obtain sufficient proceeds from those dispositions to meet our debt service and other obligations when due. We are dependent upon third party suppliers, making us vulnerable to supply problems and price fluctuations. We rely on a number of suppliers who manufacture the comp1nts for and perform assembly of the Pods and PDMs. In addition, a subsidiary of Flex in China performs assembly and supplies all finished Omnipod Systems. We do not have long term supply agreements with all of our suppliers, and, in many cases, we, or Flex on our behalf, make purchases on the basis of individual purchase orders. In some cases our agreements with suppliers can be terminated by either party upon short notice. Additionally, our suppliers may encounter problems during manufacturing for a variety of reasons, including failure to follow specific protocols and procedures, failure to comply with applicable regulations, equipment malfunction, comp1nt part supply constraints and environmental factors, any of which could delay or impede their ability to meet our demand. Our reliance on these third party suppliers also subjects us to other risks that could harm our business, including we are not a major customer of many of our suppliers, and these suppliers may therefore give other customers needs higher priority than ours; we may not be able to obtain an adequate supply in a timely manner or on commercially reasonable terms; our suppliers may make errors in manufacturing that could negatively affect the efficacy or safety of our products, cause delays in shipment or negatively affect our reputation; we may have difficulty locating and qualifying alternative suppliers for our sole source supplies; switching comp1nts may require product redesign and submission to the FDA of a new 510(k); our suppliers manufacture products for a range of customers, and fluctuations in demand for the products these suppliers manufacture for others may affect their ability to deliver products to us in a timely manner; thefts of our trade secrets and intellectual property could occur with the third party supply process; the occurrence of a fire, natural disaster or other catastrophe, impacting 1 or more of our suppliers, may affect their ability to deliver products to us in a timely manner; and our suppliers may encounter financial hardships unrelated to our demand, which could inhibit their ability to fulfill our orders and meet our requirements. 17 Table of Contents We may not be able to quickly establish additional or alternative suppliers, particularly for our sole source suppliers, in part because of the FDA approval process and because of the custom nature of various parts we require. Any interruption or delay in obtaining products from our third party suppliers, or our inability to obtain products from alternate sources at acceptable prices in a timely manner, could impair our ability to meet the demand of our customers and cause them to cancel orders or switch to competing products. If we are required to pay sales tax on sales of certain products, our results of operations could be adversely affected. We believe that sales of most diabetes supplies are exempt from sales tax in most U.S. jurisdictions. However, if it is subsequently determined that sales of 1 or more of our products are subject to sales tax in such jurisdictions, our obligation to pay such sales taxes could materially adversely affect our financial results. Our financial condition or results of operations may be adversely affected by international business risks. We sell the Omnipod in Europe, Canada and Israel. As a result of our international sales, we are exposed to fluctuations in product demand and sales productivity outside the United States, which may be partially attributed to foreign exchange rate changes, and have to manage the risks associated with market acceptance of the Omnipod System in foreign countries. Our efforts to introduce or expand our current or future products in foreign markets may not be successful, in which case we may have expended significant resources without realizing the expected benefit. Ultimately, the investment required for expansion into foreign markets could exceed the results of operations generated from this expansion. We are subject to foreign regulatory and import or export requirements. In order to reduce our cost of goods sold and increase our production capacity, we increasingly rely on third party suppliers located outside the United States. For example, while we expect to begin U.S. production in the first half of 2019, currently all of our Omnipod Systems are manufactured at a facility in China operated by Flex. As a result, our business is subject to risks associated with doing business internationally, including political instability and adverse economic conditions; trade protection measures, such as tariff increases, and import and export licensing and control requirements; potentially negative consequences from changes in tax laws; difficulty in staffing and managing widespread operations; difficulties associated with foreign legal systems including increased costs associated with enforcing contractual obligations in foreign jurisdictions; changes in foreign currency exchange rates; differing protection of intellectual property; unexpected changes in regulatory requirements; failure to fulfill foreign regulatory requirements on a timely basis or at all to market the Omnipod System or other future products; availability of, and changes in, reimbursement within prevailing foreign health care payment systems; adapting to the differing laws and regulations, business and clinical practices, and patient preferences in foreign markets; difficulties in managing foreign relationships and operations, including any relationships that we establish with foreign partners, distributors or sales or marketing agents; and difficulty in collecting accounts receivable and longer collection periods. In addition, expansion into foreign markets imposes additional burdens on our executive and administrative personnel, research and sales departments and general management resources. Our future success will depend in large part on our ability to anticipate and effectively manage these and other risks associated with doing business outside of the United States. Any of these factors may have a material adverse effect on our production capacity and, consequently, our business, financial condition and results of operations. 18 Table of Contents Our assumption on July 1, 2018 of the commercial activities for our Omnipod System in Europe (including, among other things, distribution, sales, marketing, training and support) following the expiration of our prior third party global distribution agreement creates several business and operational risks related to the future sales of our Omnipod System in Europe. On July 1, 2018, we assumed all commercial activities (including, among other things, distribution, sales, marketing, training and support) of our Omnipod System across Europe following the expiration of our distribution agreement with our European distributor on June 30, 2018. We expect to incur increased operating expenses as we invest in these European operations, and it is possible that the ultimate economic benefits that we derive from these investments could be less than anticipated, or that such expected economic benefits could fail to materialize at all. In connection with the expiration of this distribution agreement on June 30, 2018, we are required to pay to the former European Distributor a quarterly per unit fee for Omnipod sales by us between July 1, 2018 and June 30, 2019 to certain customers of the former European Distributor. We are recognizing a liability and an associated intangible asset for this fee as qualifying sales occur. T he actual total fee could vary significantly depending on the number of customers who count for purposes of calculating the fee under the terms of the distribution agreement and the methodology applicable for determining this number under the agreement is subject to an active arbitration proceeding between the parties in Switzerland.We estimate that the final aggregate fee for the applicable twelve month period could be in the range of approximately $10 million to $55 million . Our establishment of commercial operations in Europe creates risk associated with Brexit On June 23, 2016, in a referendum vote commonly referred to as Brexit, a majority of British voters voted to exit the European Union. In March 2017, the U.K. government officially triggered the process to formally initiate negotiations for the terms of separation from the European Union. In June 2017, the U.K. government began negotiations to leave the European Union. A withdrawal could potentially disrupt the free movement of goods, services and people between the U.K. and the European Union, undermine bilateral cooperation in key geographic areas and significantly disrupt trade between the U.K. and the European Union or other nations as the U.K. pursues independent trade relations. In addition, Brexit could lead to legal uncertainty and potentially divergent national laws and regulations as the U.K. determines which European Union laws to replace or replicate. The effects of Brexit will depend on any agreements the U.K. makes to retain access to European Union or other markets either during a transitional period or more permanently. Because this is an unprecedented event, it is unclear what long term economic, financial, trade and legal implications the withdrawal of the U.K. from the European Union will have and how such withdrawal could affect our business and applicable regulations in the U.K. and Europe. In addition, Brexit may lead other European Union member countries to consider referendums regarding their European Union membership. Any of these events, along with any political, economic and regulatory changes that may occur, could cause political and economic uncertainty in Europe and internationally and harm our business and financial results. Failure to secure or retain adequate coverage or reimbursement for our products by third party payors could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. We expect that sales of the Omnipod System will be limited unless a substantial portion of the sales price of the Omnipod System is paid for by third party payors, including private insurance companies, health maintenance organizations, preferred provider organizations, federal and state government healthcare agencies and other managed care providers. We currently have contracts establishing reimbursement for the Omnipod System with national and regional third party payors that provide reimbursement for patients residing in all 50 states. While we anticipate entering into additional contracts with other third party payors, we cannot assure that we will be successful in doing so. In addition, these contracts can generally be terminated by the third party payor without cause. Healthcare market initiatives in the United States may also lead third party payors to decline or reduce reimbursement for the Omnipod System. Moreover, compliance with administrative procedures or requirements of third party payors may result in delays in processing approvals by those payors for patients to obtain coverage for the use of the Omnipod System. Coverage decisions and rates of reimbursement increasingly require clinical evidence showing an improvement in patient outcomes. Generating this clinical evidence requires substantial time and investment and there is no guarantee of a desired outcome. We are an approved Medicare supplier and, in January 2018, CMS issued guidance clarifying that Medicare Part D Plan Sponsors may provide coverage for products such as the Omnipod System under the Medicare Part D prescription drug program. As a result, we must negotiate with third party payors in order to provide our product through the pharmacy channel to users who are covered under Medicare Part D. Compliance with administrative procedures or requirements of these third party payors may result in delays in processing approvals by those payors for patients to obtain Medicare Part D coverage for the use of the Omnipod System. Medicaid coverage decisions are made by the governing authorities in each state. As the Medicaid coverage process and stakeholders are unique to each state, the timeline to gain coverage in each state may vary. 19 Table of Contents We expect to sell Omnipod DASH primarily through the pharmacy channel. As such, this may require new or amended agreements with our intermediaries and payors. The availability of Omnipod DASH may be limited or restricted if we are unable to secure the same level of reimbursement we currently have for the Omnipod. As we expand our sales and marketing efforts outside of the United States, we face additional risks associated with obtaining and maintaining reimbursement from foreign health care payment systems on a timely basis or at all. Failure to secure or retain adequate coverage or reimbursement for the Omnipod System by third party payors could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We face competition from numerous competitors, many of whom have far greater resources than we have, which may make it more difficult for us to achieve significant market penetration and which may allow them to develop additional products for the treatment of diabetes that compete with the Omnipod System. The medical device industry is intensely competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other market activities of industry participants. The Omnipod System competes with several existing insulin delivery devices as well as other methods for the treatment of diabetes. Medtronic MiniMed, a division of Medtronic, has been the market leader for many years and has the majority share of the conventional insulin pump market in the United States. Other suppliers we compete with include Tandem Diabetes Care, Inc. and Roche Holdings Ltd. Many of our competitors are large, well capitalized companies with significantly more market share and resources than we have. As a consequence, they are able to spend more aggressively on product development, marketing, sales and other product initiatives than we can. Many of these competitors have significantly greater name recognition; different and more complete reimbursement profiles; established relations with healthcare professionals, customers and third party payors; larger and more established distribution ne2rks; greater experience in conducting research and development, manufacturing, clinical trials, marketing and obtaining regulatory approval; and greater financial and human resources for product development, sales and marketing and patent litigation. We also compete with MDI therapy, which is substantially less expensive than pump therapy. MDI therapy has been made more effective by the introduction of long acting insulin analogs that can be used in combination with bolus devices. While we believe that pump therapy, in general, and the Omnipod System, in particular, have significant competitive and clinical advantages over traditional MDI therapy, improvements in the effectiveness of MDI therapy may result in fewer people with insulin dependent diabetes converting from MDI therapy to pump therapy than we expect and may result in negative price pressure. In addition to the established insulin pump competitors, several companies are working to develop and market new insulin patch pumps and other methods for the treatment of diabetes. These companies are at various stages of development and the number of such companies continuously change as they enter or exit the market on an ongoing basis. Our current competitors or other companies may at any time develop additional products for the treatment of diabetes. If an existing or future competitor develops a product that competes with or is superior to the Omnipod System, our revenue may decline. In addition, some of our competitors may compete by changing their pricing model or by lowering the price of their insulin delivery systems or ancillary supplies. If these competitors products were to gain acceptance by healthcare professionals, people with insulin dependent diabetes or third party payors, a downward pressure on prices could result. If prices were to fall, we may not improve our gross margins or sales growth sufficiently to achieve profitability. We rely on the proper function, availability and security of our information technology systems to operate our business and a cyber attack or other breach or disruption of these systems could have a material adverse effect on our business and results of operations. We rely on information technology systems to process, transmit and store electronic information in our day to day operations. The form and function of such systems may change over time as our business needs change. The nature of our business involves the receipt and storage of personal and financial information regarding our patients. We use our information technology systems to manage or support a variety of business processes and activities, including sales, shipping, billing, customer service, procurement and supply chain, manufacturing and accounts payable. In addition, we use enterprise information technology systems to record, process, and summarize transactions and other financial information and results of 20 Table of Contents operations for internal reporting purposes and to comply with regulatory financial reporting, legal, and tax requirements. Our information technology systems may be susceptible to damage, disruptions or shutdowns due to computer viruses, attacks by computer hackers, failures during the process of upgrading or replacing software, databases or comp1nts thereof, power outages, hardware failures, telecommunication failures, user errors or catastrophic events. Any failure by us to maintain or protect our information technology systems and data integrity, including from cyber attacks, intrusions, disruptions or shutdowns, could result in the unauthorized access to patient data and personally identifiable information, theft of intellectual property or other misappropriation of assets or the loss of key data and information, or otherwise compromise our confidential or proprietary information and disrupt our operations. If our information technology systems are breached or suffer severe damage, disruption or shutdown and we are unable to effectively resolve the issues in a timely manner, our business and operating results may be materially and adversely affected. If our efforts to maintain the privacy and security of our customer, patient, third party payor, employee, supplier or Company information are not successful, we could incur substantial additional costs and become subject to litigation, enforcement actions and reputational damage. Our business, like that of most medical device manufacturers, involves the receipt, storage and transmission of patient information and payment and reimbursement information, as well as confidential information about third party payors, our employees, our suppliers and our Company. Our information systems are vulnerable to an increasing threat of continually evolving cybersecurity risks. Unauthorized parties may attempt to gain access to our systems or information through fraud or other means of deceiving our employees or third party service providers. Hardware, software or applications we develop or obtain from third parties may contain defects in design or manufacture or other problems that could unexpectedly compromise information and device security. The methods used to obtain unauthorized access, disable or degrade service or sabotage systems are also constantly changing and evolving, and may be difficult to anticipate or detect for long periods of time. We have implemented and regularly review and update processes and procedures to protect against unauthorized access to or use of secured data and to prevent data loss. However, the ever evolving threats mean we must continually evaluate and adapt our systems and processes, and our efforts may not be adequate to safeguard against all data security breaches, misuse of data or sabotage of our systems. Any future significant compromise or breach of our data security, whether external or internal, or misuse of customer, third party payor, employee, supplier or Company data, could result in additional significant costs, lost sales, fines, lawsuits and damage to our reputation. In addition, as the regulatory environment related to information security, data collection and use, and privacy becomes increasingly rigorous, with new and constantly changing requirements applicable to our business, compliance with those requirements could also result in additional costs. Technological breakthroughs in diabetes monitoring, treatment or prevention could render the Omnipod System obsolete. The diabetes treatment market is subject to rapid technological change and product innovation. The Omnipod System is based on our proprietary technology, but a number of companies, medical researchers and existing pharmaceutical companies are pursuing new delivery devices, delivery technologies, sensing technologies, procedures, drugs and other therapeutics for the monitoring, treatment and or prevention of insulin dependent diabetes. For example, FDA approval of a commercially viable closed loop or "hybrid closed loop" system that combines continuous real time glucose sensing or monitoring and automatic continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion in a manner that delivers appropriate amounts of insulin on a timely basis with reduced patient direction could have a material adverse effect on our revenue and future profitability. Medtronic has developed a "hybrid closed loop" system with FDA approval, which was commercially launched in 2017 and which could negatively impact our business. In addition, the National Institutes of Health and other supporters of diabetes research are continually seeking ways to prevent, cure or improve the treatment of diabetes. Any technological breakthroughs in diabetes monitoring, treatment or prevention could render the Omnipod System obsolete, which would have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our own new product development initiatives may prove to be ineffective or not commercially successful. We have ongoing initiatives to develop products to improve the treatment of Type 1 diabetes and to treat patients with highly insulin resistant Type 2 diabetes. No assurances can be given that these or other development initiatives by us will be successful. The failure to successfully bring any of these products to market could have an adverse effect on our business and results of operations. If our existing license agreement with Abbott, which allows us to incorporate a blood glucose meter into the Omnipod, is terminated or if Abbott's FreeStyle meter is less desirable to our current and potential customers, our business may be materially adversely impacted. Our rights to incorporate the FreeStyle blood glucose meter into the Omnipod are governed by a development and license agreement with Abbott. This agreement provides us with a non exclusive, fully paid, non transferable and non sublicensable license under patents and other relevant technical information relating to the FreeStyle blood glucose meter during the term of 21 Table of Contents the agreement. As amended in December 2018, this agreement has been extended through January 2023 The agreement may be terminated prior to 2023 in the event of certain breaches by either party. Breach of the contract by us could lead to damages and result in a loss of the license. Such a loss in the near term could require us to either remove the blood glucose meter from PDMs sold in the future, which could impair the functionality of the Omnipod, or attempt to incorporate an alternative blood glucose meter into the PDM, either of which would require significant development and regulatory activities that might not be completed in time to prevent an interruption in the availability of the Omnipod to our customers. These could result in a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. The FreeStyle blood glucose meter in our PDM is only approved for use with FreeStyle test strips in the United States. Not all third party payors reimburse patients for the purchase and use of FreeStyle test strips to the same extent as they reimburse patients for other brands of test strips. The absence or reduction in such reimbursement or availability of the test strips may make the Omnipod less desirable to our current and potential customers. In the future, we may need additional agreements or licenses to intellectual property or other rights in order to sell our current product or commercialize new products. If we cannot obtain these agreements, licenses, or other rights, we may not be able to sell, develop or commercialize these products. Our rights to use technologies licensed to us by third parties are not entirely within our control, and we may not be able to continue selling the Omnipod or sell future products without these rights. Our non insulin drug delivery product line faces challenges which, if not met, may impair its future success. Our non insulin drug delivery product line involves the development, manufacturing and sale of a modified Omnipod System for delivery of a specific drug other than insulin. The majority of our commercialized drug delivery revenue consists of sales of a customized version of our product for use in Amgen's Neulasta Onpro kit. The marketing and sales initiatives driving this product line differ markedly from those on which we rely for our sales of Omnipod Systems to treat diabetes since the non insulin drug delivery devices depend on marketing and sales to pharmaceutical companies, not to patients and clinicians. We expect that the future results of our non insulin drug delivery product line will face several challenges, including our identification of drug delivery opportunities appropriate for a modified Omnipod System; our achievement of satisfactory development and pricing terms with the pharmaceutical companies that sell such drugs; our development of appropriate modifications to our Omnipod System technology to address the needs and parameters required for the respective drug delivery opportunities; manufacturing issues relating to the modified Omnipod System; long lead times associated with the development, regulatory approvals and ramp up applicable to the use of modified Omnipod Systems for the delivery of such drugs; relatively small number of modified Omnipod Systems needed to address each drug delivery opportunity; uncertainties regarding the market acceptance of such drugs and the modified Omnipod Systems as appropriate delivery devices; uncertainties relating to the success of the pharmaceutical companies in marketing and selling such drugs as well as the modified Omnipod Systems as the appropriate delivery devices; intense competition in the drug delivery industry, including from competitors which have substantially greater resources than we do; maintaining appropriate gross margins; and regulatory requirements and reimbursement rates associated with such drugs. If we are unsuccessful in overcoming 1 or more of these challenges, or if our agreement with Amgen is terminated, our financial results could be materially and adversely impacted. The patent rights on which we rely to protect the intellectual property underlying our products may not be adequate, which could enable third parties to use our technology and would harm our continued ability to compete in the market. Our success will depend in part on our continued ability to develop or acquire commercially valuable patent rights and to protect these rights adequately. Our patent position is generally uncertain and involves complex legal and factual questions. The risks and uncertainties that we face with respect to our patents and other related rights include the following the pending patent applications we have filed or to which we have exclusive rights may not result in issued patents or may take longer than we expect to result in issued patents; the claims of any patents that are issued may not provide meaningful protection; 22 Table of Contents we may not be able to develop additional proprietary technologies that are patentable; and other companies may design around technologies we have patented, licensed or developed. We also may not be able to protect our patent rights effectively in some foreign countries. For a variety of reasons, we may decide not to file for patent protection. Our patent rights underlying the our products may not be adequate, and our competitors or customers may design around our proprietary technologies or independently develop similar or alternative technologies or products that are equal or superior to ours without infringing on any of our patent rights. In addition, the patents licensed or issued to us may not provide a competitive advantage. The occurrence of any of these events may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Other rights and measures we have taken to protect our intellectual property may not be adequate, which would harm our ability to compete in the market. In addition to patents, we rely on a combination of trade secrets, copyright and trademark laws, confidentiality, non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements and other contractual provisions and technical measures to protect our intellectual property rights. Despite these measures, any of our intellectual property rights could be challenged, invalidated, circumvented or misappropriated. While we currently require employees, consultants and other third parties to enter into confidentiality, non disclosure or assignment of invention agreements, or a combination thereof where appropriate, any of the following could still occur the agreements may be breached; we may have inadequate remedies for any breach; trade secrets and other proprietary information could be disclosed to our competitors; or others may independently develop substantially equivalent or superior proprietary information and techniques or otherwise gain access to our trade secrets or disclose such technologies. If, for any of the above reasons, our intellectual property is disclosed or misappropriated, it would harm our ability to protect our rights and have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We may need to initiate lawsuits to protect or enforce our patents and other intellectual property rights, which could be expensive and, if we lose, could cause us to lose some of our intellectual property rights, which would harm our ability to compete in the market. We rely on patents to protect a portion of our intellectual property and our competitive position. The patent laws that relate to the scope of claims in the technology fields in which we operate are still evolving and, consequently, certain patent positions in the medical device industry are generally uncertain. In order to protect or enforce our patent rights, we may initiate patent litigation against third parties, such as infringement suits or interference proceedings. Litigation may be necessary to assert claims of infringement; enforce our patents; protect our trade secrets or know how; or determine the enforceability, scope and validity of the proprietary rights of others. Any lawsuits that we initiate could be expensive, take significant time and divert management attention from other business concerns. Litigation also puts our patents at risk of being invalidated or interpreted narrowly and our patent applications at risk of not issuing. Additionally, we may provoke third parties to assert claims against us. We may not prevail in any lawsuits that we initiate and the damages or other remedies awarded, if any, may not be commercially valuable. The occurrence of any of these events could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Claims that our current or future products infringe or misappropriate the proprietary rights of others could adversely affect our ability to sell those products and cause us to incur additional costs. Substantial litigation over intellectual property rights exists in the medical device industry, and we have settled infringement suits in the past. We expect that we could be increasingly subject to third party infringement claims as our revenue increases, the number of competitors grows and the functionality of products and technology in different industry segments overlaps. Third parties may currently have, or may eventually be issued, patents on which our current or future products or technologies may infringe. Any of these third parties might make a claim of infringement against us. Such litigation, regardless of its outcome, could result in the expenditure of significant financial resources and the diversion of management time and resources. In addition, such litigation could cause negative publicity, adversely affect prospective customers, cause product shipment delays, limit or prohibit us from manufacturing, marketing or selling our current or future 23 Table of Contents products, require us to develop non infringing technology, make substantial payments to third parties or enter into royalty or license agreements, which may not be available on acceptable terms or at all. If a successful claim of infringement were made against us and we could not develop non infringing technology or license the infringed or similar technology on a timely and cost effective basis, our revenue could decrease substantially and we could be exposed to significant liability. A court could enter orders that temporarily, preliminarily or permanently enjoin us or our customers from making, using, selling, offering to sell or importing our current or future products, or could enter an order mandating that we undertake certain remedial activities. We are subject to extensive government regulation, both in the United States and abroad, which could restrict the sales and marketing of our products and could cause us to incur significant costs. Our medical device products and operations are subject to extensive regulation by the FDA and various other federal, state, local and foreign government authorities. Government regulation of medical devices is meant to assure their safety and effectiveness, and includes regulation of, among other things design, development and manufacturing; testing, labeling, content and language of instructions for use and storage; clinical trials; product safety; marketing, sales and distribution; regulatory clearances and approvals including premarket clearance and approval; conformity assessment procedures; product traceability and record keeping procedures; advertising and promotion; product complaints, complaint reporting, recalls and field safety corrective actions; post market surveillance, including reporting of deaths or serious injuries and malfunctions that, if they were to recur, could lead to death or serious injury; post market studies; and product import and export. The regulations to which we are subject are complex and have tended to become more stringent over time. Regulatory changes could result in restrictions on our ability to carry on or expand our operations, higher than anticipated costs or lower than anticipated sales. Before a new medical device, or a significant modification of a medical device, including a new use of or claim for an existing product, can be marketed in the United States, it must first receive either 510(k) clearance or pre market approval from the FDA, unless an exemption applies. In the 510(k) clearance process, the FDA must determine that a proposed device is "substantially equivalent" to a device legally on the market, known as a "predicate" device, with respect to intended use, technology and safety and effectiveness, in order to clear the proposed device for marketing. Clinical data is sometimes required to support substantial equivalence. In December 2012 we received 501(k) clearance for our Omnipod. We have since obtained clearance for modified versions of this device, including Omnipod DASH. We may be required to obtain a new 510(k) clearance or pre market approval for significant further post market modifications to the Omnipod System. Obtaining 510(k) clearance or pre market approval for medical devices can be expensive and lengthy, and entail significant user fees, unless an exemption is available. The FDA process for obtaining 510(k) clearance usually takes 3 to twelve months, but it can last longer. In the PMA approval process, the FDA must determine that a proposed device is safe and effective for its intended use based, in part, on extensive data, including but not limited to, technical, pre clinical, clinical trial, manufacturing and labeling data. The process for obtaining pre market approval is much more costly and uncertain and it generally takes from 1 to 3 years, or longer, from the time the application is filed with the FDA. Modifications to products that are approved through a PMA application generally need FDA approval. Some of our future products may require PMA approval. In addition, the FDA may demand that we obtain a PMA prior to marketing future changes of our existing Omnipod System. Further, we may not be able to obtain additional 510(k) clearances or pre market approvals for new products or for modifications to, or additional indications for, the Omnipod System in a timely fashion or at all. Delays in obtaining future clearances could adversely affect our ability to introduce new or enhanced products in a timely manner which in turn could harm our revenue and future profitability. 24 Table of Contents We also are subject to numerous post marketing regulatory requirements, which include quality system regulations related to the manufacturing of our devices, labeling regulations and medical device reporting regulations. The last of these regulations requires us to report to the FDA if our devices cause or contribute to a death or serious injury, or malfunction in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction recurred. If we fail to comply with present or future regulatory requirements that are applicable to us, we may be subject to enforcement action by the FDA, which may include any of the following sanctions untitled letters, warning letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees and civil penalties; customer notification, or orders for repair, replacement or refunds; voluntary or mandatory recall or seizure of our current or future products; administrative detention by the FDA of medical devices believed to be adulterated or misbranded; imposing operating restrictions, suspension or shutdown of production; refusing our requests for 510(k) clearance or pre market approval of new products, new intended uses or modifications to the Omnipod System; rescinding 510(k) clearance or suspending or withdrawing pre market approvals that have already been granted; and criminal prosecution. The occurrence of any of these events may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, the FDA may change its clearance and approval policies, adopt additional regulations or revise existing regulations, or take other actions that may prevent or delay approval or clearance of our products under development or impact our ability to modify our currently approved or cleared products on a timely basis. For example, as part of the 21 st Century Act passed in 2016 and subsequently, the FDA Reauthorization Act of 2017, Congress enacted several reforms that further affect medical device regulation both pre and post approval. While those changes are still being implemented by FDA, this serves as an example of the rapidly changing regulatory environment in which we operate. In addition, regulatory requirements may change in the future in a way that adversely affects us. For instance, the FDA is in the process of reviewing the 510(k) approval process and criteria and has announced initiatives to improve the current pre market and post market regulatory processes and requirements associated with infusion pumps and other home use medical devices. As part of this effort, the FDA is reviewing the adverse event reporting and recall processes for insulin pumps. Any change in the laws or regulations that govern the clearance and approval processes relating to our current and future products could make it more difficult and costly to obtain clearance or approval for new products, or to produce, market and distribute existing products. The Omnipod is also sold in a number of European countries, Canada and Israel. As a result, we are required to comply with additional foreign regulatory requirements. For example, in April 2009, we first received CE Mark approval for the Omnipod and in November 2017 we received CE Mark approval for Omnipod DASH. The CE Mark gives us authorization to distribute the Omnipod and Omnipod DASH throughout the European Union and in other countries that recognize the CE Mark. Additionally, in September 2009, we first received Health Canada approval to distribute the Omnipod throughout Canada. As we expand our sales efforts internationally, we may need to obtain additional foreign approval certifications. There is no guarantee that the FDA will grant 510(k) clearance or PMA approval of our future products, and failure to obtain necessary clearances or approvals for our future products would adversely affect our ability to grow our business. Some of our new or modified products will require FDA clearance of a 510(k) or FDA approval of a PMA. The FDA may not clear or approve these products for the indications that are necessary or desirable for successful commercialization. Indeed, the FDA may refuse our requests for 510(k) clearance or premarket approval of new products. Even early stage review may result in issues. For example, the FDA has issued guidance documents intended to explain the procedures and criteria the FDA will use in assessing whether a 510(k) and PMA submissions meets a minimum threshold of acceptability and should be accepted for substantive review. Under the Refuse to Accept guidance, the FDA conducts an early review against specific acceptance criteria to inform 510(k) and PMA submitters if the submission is administratively complete, or if not, to identify the missing element(s). Submitters are given the opportunity to provide the FDA with the identified information. If the information is not provided within a defined time, the submission will not be accepted for FDA review. Significant delays in receiving clearance or approval, or the failure to receive clearance or approval for our new products would have an adverse effect on our ability to expand our business. 25 Table of Contents If we, our contract manufacturer or our comp1nt suppliers fail to comply with the FDA quality system regulations, the manufacturing and distribution of our devices could be interrupted, and our product sales and operating results could suffer. We, our contract manufacturer and our comp1nt suppliers are required to comply with the FDA quality system regulations ("QSR"), which is a complex regulatory framework that covers the procedures and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, sterilization, storage, shipping and servicing of our devices. Compliance with applicable regulatory requirements is subject to continual review and is monitored rigorously through periodic, sometimes unannounced, inspections by the FDA. We cannot assure you that our facilities or our contract manufacturer or comp1nt suppliers facilities would pass any future quality system inspection. If our or any of our contract manufacturer or comp1nt suppliers facilities fails a quality system inspection, the manufacturing or distribution of our devices could be interrupted and our operations disrupted. Failure to take adequate and timely corrective action in response to an adverse quality system inspection could force a suspension or shutdown of our labeling operations or the manufacturing operations of our contract manufacturer, or a recall of our devices. If we, or our manufacturers, fail to adhere to QSR requirements, this could delay production of our products and lead to fines, difficulties in obtaining regulatory clearances, recalls, enforcement actions, including injunctive relief or consent decrees, or other consequences, which could, in turn, have a material adverse effect on our financial condition or results of operations. If our products, or malfunction of our products, cause or contribute to a death or a serious injury, we will be subject to medical device reporting regulations, which can result in voluntary corrective actions or agency enforcement actions. Under the FDA medical device reporting regulations, medical device manufacturers are required to report to the FDA information that a device has or may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or has malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury if the malfunction of the device or 1 of our similar devices were to recur. Any such adverse event involving our products could result in future voluntary corrective actions, such as recalls or customer notifications, or agency action, such as inspection or enforcement action. Adverse events involving our products have been reported to us in the past, and we cannot guarantee that they will not occur in the future. Any corrective action, whether voluntary or involuntary, will require the dedication of our time and capital, distract management from operating our business and may harm our reputation and financial results. Our current or future products may be subject to product recalls even after receiving FDA clearance or approval. A recall of our products, either voluntarily or at the direction of the FDA, or the discovery of serious safety issues with our products, could have a significant adverse impact on us. The FDA and similar governmental bodies in other countries have the authority to require the recall of our current or future products if we or our contract manufacturers fail to comply with relevant regulations pertaining to manufacturing practices, labeling, advertising or promotional activities, or if new information is obtained concerning the safety or efficacy of these products. For example, under the FDA medical device reporting, or MDR, regulations, we are required to report to the FDA any incident in which our product may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or in which our product malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury. Repeated product malfunctions may result in a voluntary or involuntary product recall. A government mandated recall could occur if the FDA finds that there is a reasonable probability that the device would cause serious, adverse health consequences or death. A voluntary recall by us could occur as a result of any material deficiency in a device, such as manufacturing defects, labeling deficiencies, packaging defects or other failures to comply with applicable regulations. In general, if we decide to make a change to our product, we are responsible for determining whether to classify the change as a recall. It is possible that the FDA could disagree with our initial classification. The FDA requires that certain classifications of recalls be reported to the FDA within 10 working days after the recall is initiated. In general if any change or group of changes to a device addresses a violation of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, that change would generally constitute a medical device recall and require submission of a recall report to the FDA. Recalls of any of our products would divert managerial and financial resources and have an adverse effect on our reputation, results of operations and financial condition, which could impair our ability to produce our products in a cost effective and timely manner in order to meet our customers demands. We may also be subject to liability claims, be required to bear other costs, or take other actions that may have a negative impact on our future sales and our ability to generate profits. Companies are required to maintain certain records of recalls, even if they are not reportable to the FDA. We may initiate voluntary recalls involving our products in the future that we determine do not require notification of the FDA. If the FDA disagrees with our determinations, they could require us to report those actions as recalls. A future recall announcement could harm our reputation with customers and negatively affect our sales. In addition, the FDA could take enforcement action for failing to report the recalls when they were conducted. Further, under the FDA medical device reporting, or MDR, regulations, we are required to report to the FDA any incident in 26 Table of Contents which our product may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or in which our product malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury. Repeated product malfunctions may result in a voluntary or involuntary product recall, which could divert managerial and financial resources, impair our ability to manufacture our products in a cost effective and timely manner, and have an adverse effect on our reputation, results of operations and financial condition. We are also required to follow detailed recordkeeping requirements for all firm initiated medical device corrections and removals, and to report such corrective and removal actions to FDA if they are carried out in response to a risk to health and have not otherwise been reported under the MDR regulations. If the third parties on which we rely to conduct our clinical trials and to assist us with pre clinical development do not perform as contractually required or expected, we may not be able to obtain regulatory clearance or approval or commercialize our products. We rely on third parties, such as contract research organizations, medical institutions, clinical investigators, contract laboratories and other third parties to conduct some of our clinical trials and pre clinical investigations. If these third parties do not successfully carry out their contractual duties or regulatory obligations or meet expected deadlines, or if the quality or accuracy of the data they obtain is compromised due to the failure to adhere to our clinical protocols or regulatory requirements or for other reasons, our pre clinical development activities or clinical trials may be extended, delayed, suspended or terminated, and we may not be able to obtain regulatory approval for, or successfully commercialize, our products on a timely basis, if at all, and our business, operating results and prospects may be adversely affected. Furthermore, our third party clinical trial investigators may be delayed in conducting our clinical trials for reasons outside of their control. We may be subject to enforcement action if we engage in improper marketing or promotion of our products. Our promotional materials and training methods must comply with FDA and other applicable laws and regulations, including the prohibition of the promotion of unapproved, or off label, use. Doctors may use our products off label, as the FDA does not restrict or regulate a doctor choice of treatment within the practice of medicine. However, if the FDA determines that our promotional materials or training constitutes promotion of an off label use, it could request that we modify our training or promotional materials or subject us to regulatory or enforcement actions, including the issuance of an untitled letter, a warning letter, injunction, seizure, civil fine or criminal penalties. It is also possible that other federal, state or foreign enforcement authorities might take action if they consider our promotional or training materials to constitute promotion of an off label use, which could result in significant fines or penalties under other statutory authorities, such as laws prohibiting false claims for reimbursement. In that event, our reputation could be damaged and adoption of the products could be impaired. Although our policy is to refrain from statements that could be considered off label promotion of our products, the FDA or another regulatory agency could disagree and conclude that we have engaged in off label promotion. In addition, the off label use of our products may increase the risk of product liability claims. Product liability claims are expensive to defend and could divert our management attention, result in substantial damage awards against us, and harm our reputation. If we were found to be noncompliant with state DME licensure rules, we could lose our licensure in that state, which could prohibit us from selling our current or future products directly to patients in that state . Several states require that DME providers be licensed in order to sell products to patients in that state. Certain of these states require, among other things, that DME providers maintain an in state location. Although we believe we are in compliance with all applicable state regulations regarding licensure requirements, if we were found to be noncompliant, we could lose our licensure in that state, which could prohibit us from selling our current or future products directly to patients in that state. We are subject to federal, state and foreign laws prohibiting kickbacks and false or fraudulent claims, and other fraud and abuse laws, transparency laws, and other health care laws and regulations, which, if violated, could subject us to substantial penalties. Additionally, any challenge to or investigation into our practices under these laws could cause adverse publicity and be costly to respond to, and thus could harm our business. Our relationships with customers and third party payers are subject to broadly applicable fraud and abuse and other health care laws and regulations that may constrain our sales, marketing and other promotional activities by limiting the kinds of financial arrangements, including sales programs and certain patient and product support programs, we may have with hospitals, physicians, patients or other potential purchasers of medical devices. These laws include, among others, the federal healthcare Anti Kickback Statute, the federal civil False Claims Act, other federal health care false statement and fraud statutes, the Open Payments program, the Civil M1tary Penalties Law, and analogous fraud and abuse and transparency laws in most states, as described in greater detail in the section above entitled Government Regulation . We conduct various marketing and product training activities that involve making payments to healthcare providers and entities. While we believe and make every effort to ensure that our business arrangements with third parties and other activities and programs comply with all applicable laws, these laws are complex and our activities may be found not to be compliant with 1 of these laws, which may result in significant civil, criminal and or administrative penalties, fines, damages, and exclusion 27 Table of Contents from participation in federal health care programs. Even an unsuccessful challenge or investigation into our practices could cause adverse publicity, and be costly to respond to, and thus could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our compliance with Medicare and Medicaid regulations may be reviewed by federal or state agencies, including the OIG, CMS, and the Department of Justice, or may be subject to whistleblower lawsuits under federal and state false claims laws. To ensure compliance with Medicare, Medicaid and other regulations, government agencies conduct periodic audits of us to ensure compliance with various supplier standards and billing requirements. If we are found to have violated laws protecting the confidentiality of patient health information, we could be subject to civil or criminal penalties, which could increase our liabilities and harm our reputation or our business. There are a number of federal and state laws protecting the confidentiality of certain patient health information, including patient records, and restricting the use and disclosure of that protected information. In particular, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services promulgated patient privacy rules under HIPAA. These privacy rules protect medical records and other personal health information by limiting their use and disclosure, giving individuals the right to access, amend and seek accounting of their own health information and limiting most use and disclosures of health information to the minimum amount reasonably necessary to accomplish the intended purpose. If we are found to be in violation of the privacy rules under HIPAA, we could be subject to civil or criminal penalties, which could increase our liabilities, harm our reputation and have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We are subject to complex and evolving U.S. and foreign laws and regulations regarding privacy, data protection, and other matters. Many of these laws and regulations are subject to change and uncertain interpretation, and could result in claims, changes to our business practices, m1tary penalties, increased cost of operations, or declines in user growth or engagement, or otherwise harm our business. We are subject to a variety of laws and regulations in the United States and abroad that involve matters central to our business, including laws and regulations relating to privacy and data protection, rights of publicity, content, intellectual property, advertising, marketing, distribution, data security, data retention and deletion, personal information, electronic contracts and other communications, competition, protection of minors, consumer protection, telecommunications, product liability, taxation, economic or other trade prohibitions or sanctions, corrupt practices, fraud, waste and abuse restrictions, and securities law compliance. The introduction of new products or expansion of our activities in certain jurisdictions may subject us to additional laws and regulations. For example, data protection laws passed by the federal government, many states and foreign countries require notification to users when there is a security breach for personal data. In addition, foreign data protection, privacy, and other laws and regulations can be more restrictive than those in the United States. Data localization laws in some countries generally mandate that certain types of data collected in a particular country be stored and or processed within that country. We could be subject to audits in Europe and around the world, particularly in the areas of consumer and data protection, as we continue to grow and expand our operations. Legislators and regulators may make legal and regulatory changes, or interpret and apply existing laws, in ways that make our products less useful to our customers, require us to incur substantial costs, expose us to unanticipated civil or criminal liability, or cause us to change our business practices. These changes or increased costs could negatively impact our business and results of operations in material ways. For example, the General Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR") is a comprehensive update to the data protection regime in the European Economic Area that is effective in fiscal 2018. The GDPR imposes new requirements relating to, among other things, consent to process personal data of individuals, the information provided to individuals regarding the processing of their personal data, the security and confidentiality of personal data, notifications in the event of data breaches and use of third party processors. If we fail to comply with these standards, we could be subject to criminal penalties and civil sanctions, including fines and penalties for noncompliance with the GDPR, and amounts could be significant. Product liability suits, whether or not meritorious, could be brought against us due to an alleged defective product or for the misuse of our devices. These suits could result in expensive and time consuming litigation, payment of substantial damages, and an increase in our insurance rates. If our current or future products are defectively designed or manufactured, contain defective comp1nts or are misused, or if some1 claims any of the foregoing, whether or not meritorious, we may become subject to substantial and costly litigation. Misusing our devices or failing to adhere to the operating guidelines of the Omnipod System or other products based on the Omnipod System technology could cause significant harm to patients, including death. In addition, if our operating guidelines are found to be inadequate, we may be subject to liability. Product liability claims could divert management attention from our core business, be expensive to defend and result in sizable damage awards against us. While we believe that we are reasonably insured against these risks, we may not have sufficient insurance coverage for all future claims. Any product liability claims brought against us, with or without merit, could increase our product liability insurance rates or prevent us from securing continuing coverage, could harm our reputation in the industry and could reduce revenue. Product liability claims in 28 Table of Contents excess of our insurance coverage would be paid out of cash reserves harming our financial condition and adversely affecting our results of operations. Our ability to grow our revenue depends in part on our retaining a high percentage of our customers. A key to driving our revenue growth is the retention of a high percentage of our customers. We have developed retention programs aimed at both healthcare professionals and patients, which include appeals assistance, ongoing patient communications, newsletters, support, training and an automatic re order program for certain patients. We have had a satisfactory customer retention rate; however, we cannot assure you that we will maintain this retention rate in the future. Current uncertainty in global economic conditions, competition, higher levels of unemployment, changes in insurance reimbursement levels and negative financial news may negatively affect product demand. If demand for our products fluctuates as a result of economic conditions or otherwise, our ability to attract and retain customers could be harmed. The failure to retain a high percentage of our customers could negatively impact our revenue growth and may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Under our distribution model, we depend on a small number of customers, including distributors, for a large portion of our business, and changes in orders from such customers could have a significant impact on our operating results. If a major customer, either in our insulin or non insulin drug delivery businesses significantly reduces the amount of business it does with us, there could be an adverse impact on our operating results. Revenue for customers comprising more than 10% of total revenue were as follows Twelve Months Ended December 31, 2018 2017 2016 Amgen, Inc. 12% 15% 17% Ypsomed Distribution AG and affiliates 22% 16% Cardinal Health Inc. and affiliates 12% 11% 10% Customer represents less than 10% of revenue for the period. We have sponsored, and expect to continue to sponsor market studies seeking to demonstrate certain aspects of the efficacy of the Omnipod System, which may fail to produce favorable results. To help improve, market and sell the Omnipod System, we have sponsored, and expect to continue to sponsor market studies to assess various aspects of the Omnipod System functionality and its relative efficacy. The data obtained from the studies may be unfavorable to the Omnipod System or may be inadequate to support satisfactory conclusions. In addition, in the future we may sponsor clinical trials to assess certain aspects of the efficacy of the Omnipod System. If future clinical trials fail to support the efficacy of our current or future products, our sales may be adversely affected and we may lose an opportunity to secure clinical preference from prescribing clinicians, which may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If future clinical studies or other articles are published, or diabetes associations or other organizations announce positions that are unfavorable to the Omnipod System, our sales efforts and revenue may be negatively affected. Future clinical studies or other articles regarding our existing products or any competing products may be published that either support a claim, or are perceived to support a claim, that a competitor product is clinically more effective or easier to use than the Omnipod System or that the Omnipod System is not as effective or easy to use as we claim. Additionally, diabetes associations, healthcare providers that focus on diabetes or other organizations that may be viewed as authoritative could endorse products or methods that compete with the Omnipod System or otherwise announce positions that are unfavorable to the Omnipod System. Any of these events may negatively affect our sales efforts and result in decreased revenue. Our Omnipod System inventory is produced in a limited number of locations and we maintain our Omnipod System inventory in a limited number of locations globally. Until our U.S. manufacturing facility is fully operational, all of our manufacturing of complete Omnipod Systems will be conducted at a single location on manufacturing lines owned by us at a facility located in China, operated by a subsidiary of Flex. We take precautions to ensure that Flex safeguards our assets, including insurance and health and safety protocols. However, a natural or other disaster, such as a fire or flood, could cause substantial delays in our operations, damage or destroy our manufacturing equipment, and cause us to incur additional expenses. The insurance we maintain may not be adequate to cover our losses in any particular case. With or without insurance, damage to our manufacturing equipment, or to any of our suppliers, may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 29 Table of Contents In addition, substantially all of our domestic Omnipod System inventory is held at a single location in Massachusetts. Additionally, our European Omnipod System inventory is maintained by a third party logisitcs entity primarily in a single location in the Netherlands. We take precautions to safeguard our facility, including insurance, health and safety protocols and off site storage of computer data. However, a natural or other disaster, such as a fire or flood, could cause substantial delays in our operations, damage or destroy our inventory, and cause us to incur additional expenses. The insurance we maintain may not be adequate to cover our losses in any particular case. With or without insurance, damage to our facility or our other property may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If we do not effectively manage the start up and commissioning of our new manufacturing facility in the U.S., our results of operations may be adversely affected. To lower our manufacturing costs, increase supply redundancy and add capacity to support growth, we are completing the construction of a highly automated manufacturing facility in Acton, Massachusetts. As we commence operation of this facility for the production of our product, we could experience quality issues and unexpected operational delays that will decrease our gross margins and cause a shortage of product supply. Our success will depend on our ability to attract and retain personnel. Over the last several years, we have made significant changes to our senior management team and to many other positions throughout the Company. We believe we will benefit substantially from the leadership and performance of these new and promoted employees. As such, our success will depend on our ability to retain our employees, both domestically and abroad, and to attract and retain additional qualified personnel in the future. In addition, it is important to the success of the Company that the transition of new and promoted employees and executives be largely seamless. Competition for senior management personnel, and other highly skilled personnel is intense and there can be no assurances that we will be able to retain our personnel. The loss of the services of members of our senior management, and other highly skilled personnel could prevent or delay the implementation and completion of our objectives, or divert management attention to seeking qualified replacements. Additionally, the sale and after sale support of the Omnipod System is logistically complex, requiring us to maintain an extensive infrastructure of field sales personnel, diabetes educators, customer support, insurance specialists, and billing and collections personnel. We face considerable challenges in recruiting, training, managing, motivating and retaining these teams, including managing geographically dispersed efforts. If we fail to maintain and grow an adequate pool of trained and motivated personnel, our reputation could suffer and our financial position could be adversely affected. If we do not effectively manage our growth, our business resources may become strained and we may not be able to deliver the Omnipod System in a timely manner, which could harm our results of operations. Since the commercial launch of the Omnipod System, we have progressively expanded our marketing efforts to cover the entire United States. In addition, the Omnipod System is sold in a number of European countries, Canada and Israel. As we continue to expand our sales internationally, we will need to obtain regulatory approvals and reimbursement agreements with government agencies or private third party payors in those countries. Failure to obtain such agreements would limit our ability to successfully penetrate those foreign, including the European, markets. In addition, the geographic expansion of our business will require additional manufacturing capacity to supply those markets as well as additional sales and marketing resources. We expect to continue to increase our manufacturing capacity, our personnel and the scope of our U.S. and international sales and marketing efforts. This growth, as well as any other growth that we may experience in the future, will provide challenges to our organization and may strain our management and operations resources. In order to manage future growth, we will be required to improve existing, and implement new, sales and marketing efforts and distribution channels. The form and function of our enterprise information technology systems will need to change and be improved upon as our business needs change. We will need to manage our supply chain effectively, including the development of our U.S. manufacturing, our relationship with Flex and other suppliers going forward. We may also need to partner with additional third party suppliers to manufacture certain comp1nts of the Omnipod System and complete additional manufacturing lines in the future. A transition to new suppliers may result in additional costs or delays. We may misjudge the amount of time or resources that will be required to effectively manage any anticipated or unanticipated growth in our business or we may not be able to manufacture sufficient inventory, or attract, hire and retain sufficient personnel to meet our needs. If we cannot scale our business appropriately, maintain control over expenses or otherwise adapt to anticipated and unanticipated growth, our business resources may become strained, we may not be able to deliver the Omnipod System in a timely manner and our results of operations may be adversely affected. If we choose to acquire or invest in new businesses, products or technologies, instead of developing them ourselves, these acquisitions or investments could disrupt our business and could result in the use of significant amounts of equity, cash or a combination of both. 30 Table of Contents From time to time we may seek to acquire or invest in new businesses, products or technologies, instead of developing them ourselves. Acquisitions and investments involve numerous risks, including the inability to complete the acquisition or investment; disruption of our ongoing businesses and diversion of management attention; difficulties in integrating the acquired entities, products or technologies; risks associated with acquiring intellectual property; difficulties in operating the acquired business profitably; the inability to achieve anticipated synergies, cost savings or growth; potential loss of key employees, particularly those of the acquired business; difficulties in transitioning and maintaining key customer, distributor and supplier relationships; risks associated with entering markets in which we have no or limited prior experience; and unanticipated costs. In addition, any future acquisitions or investments may result in 1 or more of the following dilutive issuances of equity securities, which may be sold at a discount to market price; the use of significant amounts of cash; the incurrence of debt; the assumption of significant liabilities; increased operating costs or reduced earnings; financing obtained on unfavorable terms; large 1 time expenses; and the creation of certain intangible assets, including goodwill, the write down of which in future periods may result in significant charges to earnings. Any of these factors could materially harm our stock price, business, financial condition and results of operations. We need to expand our distribution ne2rk to maintain and grow our business and revenue. If we fail to expand and maintain an effective sales force or successfully develop our relationships with intermediaries, our business, prospects and brand may be materially and adversely affected. We currently promote, market and sell the majority of the Omnipod System through our own direct sales force. However, we also utilize domestic and international intermediaries to distribute our product to end users. We cannot assure you that we will be able to successfully develop our relationships with third party intermediaries. If we fail to do so, our sales could fail to grow or could decline, and our ability to grow our business could be adversely affected. Intermediaries that are in the business of selling other medical products may not devote a sufficient level of resources and the support required to generate awareness of our products and grow or maintain product sales. If our intermediaries are unwilling or unable to market and sell our products, or if they do not perform to our expectations, we could experience delayed or reduced market acceptance and sales of our products. If we are unable to successfully maintain effective internal control over financial reporting, investors may lose confidence in our reported financial information and our stock price and our business may be adversely impacted. As a public company, we are required to maintain internal control over financial reporting and our management is required to evaluate the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of the end of each fiscal year. Additionally, we are required to disclose in our Annual Reports on Form 10 K our management assessment of the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting along with a registered public accounting firm attestation report on the effectiveness of our internal controls. If we are not successful in maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting, there could be inaccuracies or omissions in the consolidated financial information we are required to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Additionally, even if there are no inaccuracies or omissions, we will be required to publicly disclose the conclusion of our management that our internal control over financial reporting or disclosure controls and procedures are not effective. These events could cause investors to lose confidence in our reported financial information, adversely impact our stock price, result in increased costs to remediate any deficiencies, attract regulatory scrutiny or lawsuits that could be costly to resolve and distract management attention, limit our ability to access the capital markets or cause our stock to be delisted from The NASDAQ Global Market or any other securities exchange on which it is then listed. 31 Table of Contents The price of our common stock may be volatile. The market price of our common stock is affected by a number of factors, including failure to maintain and increase production capacity and reduce per unit production costs; changes in the availability of third party reimbursement in the United States or other countries; volume and timing of orders for the our products; developments in administrative proceedings or litigation related to intellectual property rights; issuance of patents to us or our competitors; the announcement of new products or product enhancements by us or our competitors; the announcement of technological or medical innovations in the treatment or diagnosis of diabetes; changes in governmental regulations or in the status of our regulatory approvals or applications; developments in our industry; publication of clinical studies relating to our products or a competitor product; quarterly variations in our or our competitors results of operations; changes in earnings estimates or recommendations by securities analysts; and general market conditions and other factors, including factors unrelated to our operating performance or the operating performance of our competitors. At times, the fluctuations in the market price of our common stock have been unrelated or disproportionate to our operating performance. In particular, the U.S. equity markets have at times experienced significant price and volume fluctuations that have affected the market prices of equity securities of many technology companies. Broad market and industry factors such as these could materially and adversely affect the market price of our stock, regardless of our actual operating performance. Conversion of any of our Convertible Senior Notes may dilute the ownership interest of existing stockholders or depress our stock price. The conversion of some or all of our Convertible Senior Notes may dilute the ownership interests of existing stockholders. Any sales in the public market of any of our common stock issuable upon such conversion could adversely affect prevailing market prices of our common stock. In addition, the anticipated conversion of the Convertible Senior Notes into a combination of cash and shares of our common stock could depress the price of our common stock. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments N1 Item 2 Properties
